11. Bitter Chocklate
The awesome thing about this spice rub is that you can make a big double batch and keep it in a ziploc bag, which makes subsequent pork chop nights even simpler. Just mix together about 2TB. brown sugar, 1Tb. salt, 1/4 tsp. cayenne pepper, 1/2 tsp. black pepper, 1 tsp. garlic powder, 1 1/2 tsp. of paprika. Keep in mind, this is a spice rub -you can totally add and subtract these spices to your own liking. You can also make substitutions, like onion powder instead of garlic powder. Don’t be timid. And it goes without saying that you can make this up weeks, days, or hours in advance.
* Booking Window: May 3 – Aug. 14, 2010
"The Frumble family has a wide range of previous background experiences from product design, civil engineering, fine art, sewing to IT. This broad range of skills makes for an ‘interesting’ mix but we have found that it was more than enough to get us where we are today. We have designed and built the website ourselves, selected all our products and of course, learnt to lovingly package it up to get orders off to the post office in good time. A relatively small family-run team have done this without any external professionals and we hope this organic and nurtured approach is one thing that has helped us to succeed over the last 18 months."
Man, I get chills just TALKING about this book. I better stop now, I'm getting light headed.
10. Put Together a Resume That’s Actually Compelling
Pierce the eggplant all over with a fork. Drizzle with some olive oil and wrap in aluminum foil. Place on a baking sheet and bake for about 30 minutes.
From 1885 to 1894, Bob went to Summer Street elementary school, two blocks from his home. In 1894, Bob was 15 years old and entered St. Johnsbury Academy—an independent secondary school “for the intellectual, moral, and religious training of boys and girls in northeastern Vermont.” In his senior year at St. Johnsbury, he met his bride-to-be Anne Ripley Smith at a dance in the academy gym. Seventeen years later, they were married. Bob graduated from St. Johnsbury Academy in 1898. He then set off for four years at Dartmouth College, sixty miles south at Hanover, New Hampshire. He graduated in 1902 and by that time was an illustrious graduate of the college drinking “fraternity.” Sadly—by comparison with the endless biographies, stories of, by, and about, Bill Wilson and his life—A.A. has devoted only 23 pages to the foregoing general facts in the official biography of Bob’s life (See DR. BOB and the Good Oldtimers: A Biography, with recollections of early A.A. in the Midwest. NY: Alcoholics Anonymous World Services., Inc., 1980, pp. 1-23). Regrettably, most of these pages contain little more of religious and spiritual significance—mostly just a Dr. Bob drunkalog, and this not even in the words of Dr. Bob.
Jordan
Three sentence description of the book
The odd thing is this. With all this hair blowing around, it is inevitable that occasionally a hair will appear in our food. We joke that dog hair is a condiment in our house. And when I find a hair on my plate, I will pull it out of the food and identify it. “Oh, that’s Mayzie’s hair” or “that must be a llama hair”, and I think nothing of it and continue my meal. But if I see a human hair, even if I’m positive that it is my own, I suddenly lose my appetite and dinner is a done deal. Go figure.
In the sleep area, it's steadily getting worse. I am awake every night from 2-5, often I just don't get back to sleep. My brain is starting to fuzz over. Typos, forgetting things, forgetting what I was about to say, actually talking and not being able to remember a word like 'grocery store'. My brain throws up suggestions 'flea market', 'Dollar General', 'library', 'van', 'online' all scroll through while the other part of my brain waits for the traffic to clear before finally fetching forth the word I was casting around for. I have resorted to pronouns more than ever. "Just put that there." "Get the thing with the stuff." I am...tired. Just, tired. My body is tired, my head is muggy, I am tired.
I thought we were out of the woods, I mean...four and a half years later, I thought we wouldn't have to worry about too much...boy was I wrong! I do know that when a preemie gets sick, it happens hard and fast, so Monday when he was up all night long wheezing and had a fever, I knew he had to get to the hospital. We get there and the "doctor" that took care of Kenny heard he was wheezing...his pulse ox was 93 as well so they gave him a breathing treatment, still wheezing...and sent him home with prescriptions that couldn't be filled because of something written wrong on them. Fast forward to yesterday morning when he woke up and just looked very sickly. After me being up all night with breathing treatments and Tylenol/Motrin to keep his fever away...as not to cause a seizure...the wheeze was still there. I called and they got him right in for a chest x-ray and office visit. In the office, he was pulse ox-ing the very low 90's...when the doctor listened to his lungs, he wasn't moving any air at all. At that time, they ordered back to back to back albuterol treatments...7 total and he was still stating very low and having a hard time breathing. They decided to admit him to the pediatric intensive care unit where they can keep a better eye on his lungs. He, at that point, was put on 2 liters of oxygen...and he was STILL pulse ox-ing in the low to mid 90's. The flood of memories and emotions hit me like a tsunami....to.much.to.take.in. Why? After all of the struggles he has been through...why does he have to battle massive lung issues that could kill him. I lost nick to bad lungs and I really thought we were out of the woods with Kenny...but I guess this will always be an issue.
In the late 1800′s and early 1900′s, May day took on a significance of laborers and socialists vying against industrialists. After the Communists took over Russia in 1917, they established May 1st as the International Socialists day.
Scenario II
Brasserie de Rochefort (Abbaye de Notre-Dame de Saint-Rémy) Trappistes Rochefort 10
Well this will be another Margaret Holmes product that I’ll be buying more of! The noodles and seasoning was perfect and the sauce was unbelievable, a really fantastic flavor. A real hearty and delicious meal. I left the info and web site link at the bottom of the post. I also had Healthy Life Whole Grain Bread. For dessert/snack later Tostito‘s Whole Grain Scoops with Kroger Organic Black Bean and Corn Salsa.
This link has several versions and commentary on the story about the three stonecutters.
The infrastructural reforms were correct: created highly trained specialist visas and giving them 3 years. However, the execution phase is where everything breaks down. I do not mean actually getting these visas, which, with a sponsor is rather simple.
When the church speaks of its unique message - the life, death and resurrection of Christ - it draws on centuries of Christian thought and theology. I doubt Christendom has done nearly as much work on the taxation of mining profits and modern banking policies. If the clergy want to get into that area, they had better do some deeper thinking. Archbishop Freier's Good Friday publication is not going to spark a new social contract any time soon. It might pay to work out the details before we decide to ditch the present one.
My story about the alien spore of Golden Boy Promotions eating the brain of Ring magazine, a triumph of capitalism over sport, is now online & fully accessible to all at the Columbia Journalism Review site. Here are the first few paragraphs, followed by a link to the entire article.
Do not encode to MP3, do not sell, do not buy, trade only as .FLAC, do not throw things on the stage, tip your waitress.
Wondered why the world seemed incomplete,
The third section of Ted Hughes’ “Gog” evokes Holger the most strongly. This is a deep, dark, and difficult poem, and parts of it are not suitable for family reading. It deals with the lifelong and ultimately futile efforts of Everyman to escape from the softness and weakness of his mother and establish his own manhood without being sucked in and corrupted by the softness and weakness of his wife.
Life as I See It:
Another Wednesday and it's been two weeks since I joined in last time. I was away last week and took lots of hand sewing with me. I finished the binding on a quilt, worked on a Material Obsession BOM block and finished another three starflowers, not as much as I was hoping to achieve but not bad either.
*editing to add pictures*
(Anwaar enters.)
Is anybody left, that isn’t broken?
Now, yes, even now we may
Shipping: $19.95 (but FREE if you pre-order)
I had an epiphany one night while giving Liam his bath. I had to walk all the way down the hall to grab the towel (he was 4 by this point, and he sang to me the whole time I was out of the room) It would have been so much nicer if the towels were closer to the bathroom. Sure, my craft stuff (that I was hardly using) was right at my finger tips, but the towels were so far from the bathroom. Light bulb moment! Why not store my craft stuff in the "linen closet" and the towels above the dryer? That lead to more thinking, more tweaking, and then we had a system that functioned soooo much better for our family.
As such, I developed my own vision of Poison Ivy. I know she runs around in a green swimsuit/bodysuit in the comics, but she can't wear that all the time? Interesting enough, my childhood vision of Poison put her in a sort '60s time warp where she wore a shift dress made from dirt and wire from which live ivy grew and covered it and big sixties hair with a head band made of ivy. When I investigated her for IDUD, I found that she first appeared in the comics in the mid '60s. My slight psychic powers win again!
From Ann:
659 ***D-I/18(B)/1974. “One Introduction to Confucian Thought.” Works of the Mind Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. Dedicated to the memory of Leo Strauss (1899-1973). (Incorporated in Items C-1974(8) and C-1984(1), above. See Items C-1974(14) and C-1999(6), above. See, also, Item B-12, above, pp. 99-145(2002).)
It's always great to return to Hawaii, a place I call home and where I grew up. We made the best of our trip while being sick ( went to the dr. when I returned home and have bronchitis). We were somewhat disappointed in the weather on Oahu (it's been the wettest in years) but loved the dry, sunny temps of Maui. It's amazing that the islands, about 80 miles apart, had such different weather conditions. We loved the food and the mai tai's. I loved the scenery of the islands and enjoyed my time swimming with the turtles. It was great to see old friends and meet new ones. I'm looking forward to our next visit to the islands.
gm.com
There, you said it: “Huh? *scratches head*”
Well here it is.. the night before J. leaves. I am feeling surprisingly ok.. for now. The anxiety is MUCH less since I started the Zoloft and I'm grateful.
So yeah, I'd say I'm addicted to being busy and while I don't know if that's ever going to change, there is something I can do about it. I can keep myself busy with the things that are the most important, not the things that I do to keep my mind constantly entertained like watching TV, Facebook, and checking my email every five minutes. Because to me, addicted to busy isn't the problem, it's the things that are keeping me busy.
Before you blanch at my comparison of capitalism to the Nazis, look at this from the perspective of the 200 species driven extinct today, the 200 species driven extinct tomorrow, and the day after, and the day after that, in a holocaust of unimaginable proportions. Look at this from the perspective of the millions of children killed each year as a result of so-called debt repayment from the colonies to the center of empire. Look at this from the perspective of Indigenous humans forced off their lands. “Buying good stuff” does absolutely nothing to address these problems.
Without a plan, eating becomes an automatic reaction to the stimulus of having food nearby. Whether your objective is to eat healthy or to lose weight, food planning starts with a shopping list so that you have the right nutrients available when your body needs them. Otherwise, you get hungry and end up ordering pizza. When you plan your workouts, they’re on your calendar the same as a meeting or any other commitment. Sure, you can reschedule if necessary, but just the act of blocking out time for exercise makes it more likely to happen.
1038 ***D-I/22/1989. “How, Why and When Does God Speak to Men? On Sophocles’ Oedipus Tyrannos.” Lake Shore Unitarian Universalist Society, Winnetka, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-7, above, pp. 119-28 (1997).)
Open-door love
Save for I Am A Singer I don't follow any Korean TV shows myself, but it is definitely so that there is an increasing interest in Korean indie music which can be traced through--and perhaps even more so thanks to--all of the audition/survival shows out there. Since the idea of "indie spotting" was suggested as a new feature of this blog I figured I'd finally get started with a little something I've had planned since first coming across brand essential special albums compiled by Bugs Music.
For the cover Maida (all purpose flour) 500gm Salt a pinch Oil or ghee (melted) 6 to 7 tbsp For the stuffing Crumbled khoya 500 gm Almond 25 g chopped Kishmis (raisin) 25g chopped Coconut milk powder 25 grm Cashew 25gm chopped Pistachio 5 gm chopped Cardamom ½ tsp freshly ground Sugar (powder) to taste Salt a very small pinch For Frying
Speaking of excitement, at these levels the competition tends to be quite exciting. No you won't find any high school athletes running 9.58, 43.50, or 3:28.00 or jumping 28 feet or vaulting 19 feet - but you will find them giving their all and competing to the end. You will see 100 meter races that need to be separated by the photo finish. You will see stirring come from behind victories on the final lap of the mile, or final jump or throw on the field. And you will see tons of youthful exuberance as a young kid improves her best from 56.00 to 54.99 in the 400 or his best from 4:14 to 4:09 in the mile!
Artist: Marcus To
- The icecream sundae bar was a huge hit. Kurt doesn’t like cake so in addition to the cake and pastries we wanted to have an option he would enjoy. It showed a childlike side of everyone as they ran passed the coffee and cordials directly to the sundae bar.
Residential areas are prone to overpopulation and many turn to inhumane methods of ridding their neighborhoods of unwanted felines such as poisoning or dropping animals off in other areas.
The Terran leader issues a statement to the Cosmists: “But what if the Artilect decides to kill everybody? Artilects might not like us, you know. And why should they? Look at us. We can’t even get along with each other. Or they might not even care one way or another, and just step on us like we would step on ants. Building an Artilect is too risky!”
OK, so I had said that this wasn't as detailed as I usually draw scarabs, but now that the 2 halves are together I am really rethinking the final size :p
This work of fiction is original and my own. Please do not reproduce or copy it in any way without first asking permission and linking back to me with credit. The dökkálfar are dark elves from Norse legend. For image credit go here.
A side note: You will find chapter links in the sidebar now, so navigation should be easier. Look forward to a new section soon.
or Twitter about this giveaway and
Then there are also the details of the design. Here the bedding was something I wanted to be original and something one could not find anywhere else. The window treatment was also something I decided to have a bit of fun with. I had a curved wall to contend with, so came up with a creative solution there.
in his ever-squeaking wheel
Nor do the various photos and mementoes of the people involved in Onassis's life suggest there was much enjoyment to hand, since they focus on the fairly disastrous love-lives that were all over the gossip columns of their day (and on Churchill whiling away his long retirement and decline).
A Classic Tomato Sauce ~ Marinara
What’s Happening to Food
the beginning but definately getting better......
for a
I’d finished unpacking the wires, so I picked up the empty box and entered the living room to put one box inside the other to minimize the mess.
“One takes care not to eat with one’s face but one’s mouth, Bertie,” Reginald's whiskers twitched good-naturedly. He shifted around and gave his wounds a few licks. “We ought to get back, I suppose. She’ll start to fret if we are not back in time for dinner.”
This beer pours a beautiful dark yellow/orange color with a decent sized head that dissipated quite quickly and left spotty lacing on my glass. I get a good dose of fruit in the nose including apples, pears, oranges, and some Belgian style yeast in the nose. The fruit is the most dominant flavor in the flavor profile with pears and apple being the main players, and there are also flavors of lemon, pepper, and a slight hint of banana as well. The mouthfeel has medium carbonation with a fairly dry finish with the alcohol only barely noticeable. The drinkability is quite nice even at 7.75%, and I would have never guessed it was that high if I didn't read it on the bottle.
Please note: I am extremely ethical and won’t inundate you with emails.
Bye bye chairs, bye bye pavers... hello bench!
11 Ivor Cutler - I Worn My Elbows
What, then, is the basis of all this? What has the United States actually been doing in the Middle East in the recent past?
Love ya,
Mit einem Klick auf den Namen gelangt ihr zum Blog der einzelnen DT-Mitglieder. Dort könnt ihr viele wundervolle Inspirationen sehen und wenn ihr mögt einen lieben Gruß hinterlassen.
That, really, was the start of my affair with Italy. The majority of my Summer vacations since then have been spent in Tuscany and Umbria (plus a spell in Abruzzo and a short visit to Venice). Eventually, my long-term relationship split but I kept returning to Italy, either single or coupled.
Universities were the first to embrace the technology, handing out iPods to freshman and making podcasts of lectures. At the K-12 level, teachers are just starting to explore the possibilities. But podcasting isn't just about turning classroom lectures into online audio content. Many educators are turning PowerPoint presentations into podcasts, while others are using it to provide detailed audio explanations of frequently asked questions or as a tool for students to practice their vocabulary at home. Students can also create their own podcasts to interact with instructors or other students. In short, podcasting for educators adds a new dimension to teaching by making it a "cool" interactive communication between teachers and students
“I’ll live alone and find my peace/ I will slip into a coma/ Found somewhere north of Florida /But just south of Tennessee/ ‘Cause the sun I finally reached it/ Give me reason to move on now/ But there’s something in this heart I lost, somehow”
Wait...what's this? A funk, soul, assplosion of something ass-shaking to awake the inner fire of musical inspiration and joy. Yes, Friday at the Music Hall! We're saved! Hallelujah!
But I kind of think Noah will remember if I don't eat one. So I feel like I should.
All in all the night was a blast and I hope we will get to see more Free Hills Nights. They really do owe it to the loyal customers who are always willing to pay even when there are more than 3 lined up event all in one weekend.
I look over as I'm coming out of my "OH GOOD GRIEF! CAN ANYTHING ELSE GO WRONG WITH THIS GIVEAWAY?!?" grief to see....My Wish.Wonder.Suprise Swap....in the girls hands. Rhea goes..."these look just like what you made us!" Obviously my child is quite good with the obvious. It looks like I had switched the labels.
words like, “let’s talk about it”, “I am sorry” and “please forgive
What could I tell him? That I wanted to cry? That I wanted to ask him what in the heck he thought he was doing? That I wished he’d stuck to repairing his lawnmowers and left my cabinet alone? That I wanted to turn back time and give his free day back to him again? That I hated what he’d done?
As I was stalking out, I almost ran over Jamestry.
If you have a teaser today, please feel free to share it in the comments!
I'm sad to see this weekend go.
But college students aren’t buying it.
so do yourself a favor people,
Large eggs- 2
9 - 10 tbsp icing (confectioners) sugar,
Ride On Mowers – Fun to Ride
7. You might have some bitterness towards your baby. I truly believe that every mom goes through some level of postpartum depression. I remember sitting in the dark, rocking my newborn baby, crying, and thinking ‘this little baby has ruined my life!’. Irrational thought? You betcha. But it is normal to have a tough time adjusting to a new life with a baby. Its just really hard sometimes. Whats important is that you recognize your feelings and communicate them to your partner to get support.
The former prime minister shrugged off criticisms, pointing out that it was common for anyone to ignore the interests of others when trying to get their way.
At The Hop, which was first published on the Singular label, moved to ABC Records for national distribution. However, a small run of the original demo recording, which pre-dated the ABC contract, was published on the Singular label after the song became a big hit. There aren't many of these around, but they still turn up at record shows and online auction sites. It's become a collector's item worth hundreds of dollars, but most collectors still believe they are all bootleg pressings -- which is NOT the case!
AvitalLeibovich: @_Isser_ still not quiet. We targeted a launching squad about to fire rockets into #Israel. AnnaUkolova: @ilyafa пожелание ‘Palestinian’ civilians being used as human shields in Gaza ‘Palestinians’ attack border crossing that delivers humanitarian aid 13-Mar-12: A hard day’s toll Arlene Kushner On Rockets From Gaza And The Decline Of Hamas Egyptian parliament demands expulsion of Israel ambassador Arab Muslim Gas Station Owners v. Black Customers: The Real Story Behind the Killing “Over Condoms” Knesset speaker cancels delegation trip to US after MK refused visa Overnight music video Egypt to hold its breath until it turns blue To Nader’s Unborn Children
David Seamands wrote in his book Healing Grace: “Because of the Fall, imperfectness permeates the whole universe. Try to grasp the all-inclusive losses which came about. The original and innate human perfections are gone, and we can never again regain them through our efforts, no matter how hard we try.” (61-62) He lists 6 major categories of lostness we are facing since the fall. He then goes on to point out that even though there is no way for us to regain this lostness, there is hope: “If the ultimate cure is grace, then the ultimate cause of the behavior is the failure to understand, experience, and live out grace at every level of our lives. This means we must learn to give up every futile attempt to achieve right relationships by any other means than God’s total plan of grace.” (67) Grace, in freeing the entire person, is liberating, freeing. It enables us to get up and obey and worship.
1/4 cup capers, drained and patted dry, or 12 caper berries, sliced
Having moved around the world when I was little the daunting prospect of perpetually meeting new people and trying to be accepted at yet another new school meant that my mum and I became exceptionally close. That’s not taking away from the amazing times we had and I feel very lucky to have experienced lots of different things but it was unsettling nevertheless. My mum was always there to make sure I was ok and having such stoic support helped minimize the impact of how difficult it could have been. Looking back now it must have been very hard for my mum to keep nomadically moving around and having to fit in whilst making sure that I was ok as well as continually building a life of her own. By gaining in our experience she sacrificed her needs and I am in awe of her ability to pick up and run with whatever she’s faced with. She still gets on my nerves though and that’s why I love her!
For more information about what went on at this event from one person’s perspective, you can go to:
Unit 3: 26 -28 January 2012
Place your peanuts or sunflower seeds in the oven or in a pan on the stove and warm through, then roughly pound them in a pestle and mortar or chop them on a cutting board.
An acquaintance wrote me a list last night of the places he’d like me to go:
And here lies the conundrum: how do we keep platforming interesting, challenging, varied, yet accessible to most players? To figure this out, I’ve highlighted two games that (in my opinion) have fantastic environmental traversal, and will explore why they succeed where others fail so often.
After attending church regularly for over two years, she suddenly disappeared. Three months later, I bumped into her at a restaurant and asked her whether she had moved to another church. She replied, “No, I’ve quit church altogether. I just can’t bring myself to worship a God who would leave me in such loneliness.” Jennifer concluded that if she was ever going to let God back into her life, He’d better bring her a husband—and fast.
Guess that I will let you in on the secret. Stone Cottage is a gorgeous little villa on the cool North side of St. Thomas. It is small, only enough room for two people. Sherri and Jeff, the owners, have done a beautiful job of building and decorating it. The cottage is set into the side of a hill, with lush tropical trees and flowering shrubs all around. There is a wrap around balcony that provides you with a stunning view of Inner Brass and Outer Brass Islands. A nice plunge pool and lounge chairs make for a lovely, private area to enjoy cocktails. If you choose to cook, there is a kitchen, complete with stove, fridge, and many pots, utensils, even herbs and spices. The decor is Island cool, with rattan furniture and refreshing citrus colors.
That's something really up my street.
Hooray! Done! Until the next cool thing comes along that I can write down and then immediately cross off. Instant gratification.
Spiced Cranberry Sauce
The builder is currently doing the final touches on another straw bale home not far from us, and then will be able to have more time for us. It has worked out well and we are grateful to find people nearby who can help us build our home.
I wore:
I admit some of those stories were no better than their medium. A writer could hack out a 40,000 word novella in less than two weeks. Formula was everything. Thus “formula writing,” anything following the conventions of a genre, was no longer considered “literary.”
As if the brain-numbing effects of TV programming were not horrible enough, the CIA has openly admitted that it would like to use what many refer to as the “idiot box” as a bona fide surveillance tool.
This is a perfect winter meal, and is especially good with that familiar sandwich partner – a bowl of soup !
I loved this performance. I know I know… he looked as if he was going to suffer a cardial infarction. This nice young man seems so troubled all the time. His angst is right out there for everyone to see and touch and feel; and he portrays it in tune and with such depth and such a beautiful tone. Even the downright screams sound right to me. Yes, it’s over the top, but it’s all good stuff flowing over the top IMO. Still can’t put my finger on why I like him so much and hated Jacob Lusk soooo much last season.
Right, I’ll write them the check just after I finish writing this one for that Nigerian Prince who can’t seem to get a hold of his millions without my 5 grand first.
I now can give and receive more freely.
This is my favourite book as it has a biography of A.R.Quinton along with lots of his paintings and a great deal more information about rural life in late Victorian and Edwardian times than appears in the other two books.
People are hard-wired to enjoy positive reinforcement. And, well, play is fun.
We know that this research is very important for the future of diagnosis and treatment of ME/CFS patients. That is why we are asking for donations to continue this research.
It was just an odd shaped remnant- a big triangular piece was chopped out of it.
Hi again, I am so glad that you liked yesterday's freebie, as I have 2 more of a similar nature waiting to show you, but not today, today's freebie can be a snowflake, star or bauble. I have coloured it in 2 different colours, blue and Christmas, though you do get the digi stamp of the image to colour in however you wish.
Loving God who is beyond all categories, both Mother and Father, and still more yet, Bless us who live beyond categories on earth. Grant us strength and compassion; show us mercy. Teach us to love ourselves and others as you love us. Challenge us when we need it; console us when we want it. Wrap us in your love which is masculine and feminine and full and rich beyond all categories. Bless us and all beings. Amen.
The fire is burning beautifully and there are two candles on the table. There is a picture I have placed on the chair opposite me. Next to this image lies a cat. Every thing is as I know it - there is a great peace - there is a return to normalcy. Except that the picture on the couch is moving. The face is definitely moving. The eyes stretch into a smile and the cheeks move in and out as it breathes. I go to get the picture and bring it closer to me.
15th April- MTC, Cologne, Germany (with Stubb+more)
Two extra things to mention are using ‘Header Tags’ (accurate descriptions to summarize the content on a web page) properly and applying proper ‘descriptions/ file names to the images’ you will be displaying on your website. For example, PICTURE-DESCRIPTION.jpeg or PICTURE-DESCRIPTION.gif.
And we're not immune in our home. Cooking specialty dishes, coupled with lousy weather, meant far more cans, packages and normally compostable items going into our trash can the last few weeks.
What a lovely shiny car. Dad loved tinkering with it.
That if you try
For months/weeks all I could think of was using Buttercup and "How Much Is That Doggy In The Window?" oh dear.... I was rattling my poor old brain for weeks trying to think with no luck.
Card challenges:
I love hanging out at my friendly neighbourhood coffee shop. I overhear all kinds of interesting things. This past week I overheard a conversation that made my brain hurt, and I think my heart broke a little.
is such a contribution to the schools/kids/teachers. She is adorable
Time is a funny thing, isn't it? When I have one hour and fifteen minutes to get out the door in the morning those minutes go by so fast that I can't believe it. Yet, when I am working some over stimulating shift at the Bucket where I feel all out of sorts with the hoards of hungry travelers who want only to get into the restaurant and not look at all our "stuff". One hour and fifteen minutes goes by like molasses in January. I can hear every second tick by. Tick Tock Tick Tock.
To get to the blogs of our DT members just click at the name. You will find more inspiration there and if you want to you can leave a comment.
her Collage fund! The Bank itself most have cost a
Odell Brewing Company St. Lupulin
Me: I maybe love you too.
At the rehearsal dinner later that night, I tried all three kinds of pie that were offered: three-berry pie with that delicious crumbly top; pecan pie, which was sweet, savory and crunchy; and good old apple pie, undoubtedly made with apples from the local farms, which were crisp, juicy and tart (I had a couple of those too).
There’s a bunch of tiny but very significant things that need to be realized by everyone; especially the above. The most basic thing to understand is that damage from/a reaction to vaccines is at the base, a chemical and/or immune system reaction. These types of reactions, while very similar, affect everyone differently. (I’m currently working on a project to show this-more in the future, promise) An easy example would be the gut/brain/opiate response/leaky gut/blah blah blah. I’m speculating here so don’t all bounce off the walls with your loud speaker *cough*caps lock*cough* squawking for links to it all. They’re made up, it’s an example. Okay, that clear let’s get to it then. We have 1,000 kids with autism. 76% of those kids have ‘gut issues’ which is 760 kids. Now only 10% of those kids experience just gut damage without the corresponding ‘opiate receptor damage’ which is 76 kids. The other 684 kids have gut damage + opiate receptor damage. While the remaining 34% will be divided with some children having just opiate receptor damage but no gut damage and a few may have neither. But all have autism and all more than likely had a reaction to vaccines or by ‘similar means’. Did you get the point though? A standard study would only show 760 out of 1,000 kids have various gut issues. That’s it, they don’t look for opioids and I’m not sure if they have the capabilities – or the drive – to check if these kids have damage to that part of the brain. Without both occurring at once and being measured, we wouldn’t even have a clue. It is possible to do a urine test that would show high opiate levels if this issue exists. The problem can arise though if you are already starting the appropriate diet. You would have to feed your child opiate containing foods in order to get an accurate measure. It’s worth it to test before you start but in my opinion, if you’ve already started treatment measures then don’t go back on what is already working and know that your child may not suffer from both and that should be some relief because the treatment involves getting rid of two of the most common foods.
The couple was overjoyed.
this final incarnation (2nd edition) has been finally given artwork, a slight remaster and an additional track; Memory Shield. thank you, and please enjoy.
Me? I'm Mrs. Green. Because of my garden. Which, might I add, is fully organic.
I awoke this morning and felt like I was forgetting something. Then I remembered. Today is Gorgeous Shiny Thing's 3 year Blogiversary. I had thought about what I would do for this post last week and then it slipped my mind. I don't think I every celebrated a Blogiversary to date, so this morning I decided to change that.
So, what do you think? Wouldn't that be a nice Hostess Gift or gift in general for someone special for Christmas?
The pauses in particular are often prolonged – his 26 seconds on Postmodernism is as follows (the dots indicate the pauses): “Postmodernism obviously comes after modernism ………………………… I wonder what the difference is ……………… perhaps it has something to do with refection”
lack of fantasy baseball: this is the first year in ages i am playing no forms of fantasy baseball (or any fantasy sport for that matter). oddly it’s also the year i’ve had the most time to watch and analyze baseball. i’d likely be killing my league right now after 4 months of watching the sport non stop from the first day of spring training on.
a swing. This is what it feels
The plot. I could go on about the plot holes, how the big action scene is actually just chucked into the movie with the flimsiest of writing, or how characters are just written so stupid it hurts. But let me sum everything up with one key factor. Everything about the movie, the event that starts everything, the one motivation behind the things that happen is all made moot when you realise that it was needless. Instead of all these complicated actions, instead of the bloodshed and the smuggling, the threats and the betrayal, all one person had to do was ask a friend for money. That’s it. There is no need for the actions of characters, for the introduction of villains, for the pointless twists, everything the movie is, is a complete waste of time. This is one of the biggest sins a movie can make, if everything could so easily be avoided then why are we watching this damn movie.
Where these unwanted accessories came from, I really don’t know. I’m sure my arms used to be quite firm. Either they must have been full of fat, or full of muscle, and I don’t think it was the latter because I would have looked like a pumped-up Madonna.
for someone like JR Martinez, who really has been the frontrunner from the start. The problem with always being at the top of the leaderboard, is that at some point you arent going to WOW people as much as the previous week, and it will result in criticism. This was not JR’s best performance, but it certainly was not a bad performance. It’s all about timing and peaking at the right points in the competition – JR might not have eaked at the right time, but if he can bounce back next week… he’ll be back on track.
The fact that I was unable to share as candidly as I wanted to was the reason that I needed to take a step back from the blog. I wanted my voice to help bring light to the subject & make other women who were suffering in silence feel more comfortable about getting help for themselves. The reason I got help was because another blogger started posting about her experience with Postpartum Depression & because I saw her participating in #ppdchat on Twitter (Mondays at 1pm & 8:30pm EST) and joined in. So I wanted to pay it forward to other women.
I would also like to add a big thank you to all the people who donated for the last camp. It happened because of you! We appreciate it from the bottom of our hearts.
A4 Mass Production 3:03
THE POP COP: Do you like getting awards?
Once in a while, the time is just right – the perfect night, with just the right company, the perfect cocktail in hand and a perfect star-filled cloudless sky overhead, accompanied by a perfect breeze. The convergence of “perfect factors” is what makes Saturdays at Miss Favela in Williamsburg (yes, that’s Brooklyn.. take a deep breath) one of the most special experiences in our fair city.
As things progressed the characters fell into bad company and ended up raiding a caravan carrying goods belonging to a powerful sorcerer, who happened to abide in the city depicted above. He magically imprisoned their souls and used this as leverage to force them to undertake various ill advised ventures to dark and dangerous places including the ghoul haunted ruins of Tha'al nan Jaax and the Plane of Anarchy where they were memorably pitted against motorcycle riding undead racing to retrieve an Ancient tome from a dead gods tomb ( shades of Moorcock here).
Hugh - the handsome male model - ditto for details.
I have one little girl in my class who is pretty funny. The other day she asked me for a “mooch and a hug.” The thing is she talks at warp speed so it kind of sounds like, “amoochanahug.” I had to ask her 3 times what she meant! She was getting frustrated with me, so she finally just gave me a kiss on the cheek (a “mooch”) and a hug. She’s a real cutie too. I wish you could hear the way she says, “heart.” It sounds more like, “hout.” She’s always good for saying funny things, so this week I’m featuring tiny talk by Susie (her name is not really Susie, but you know…I have to call her something and protect her privacy.) So Susie it is!
Not yet available in the UK.
Here I am gladly vegetarian. I don't have to explain why.
“Big Shot” begins with what sounds like a tape loop from some forgotten Dixieland record. But then the real song begins — a dark, slow-moving sax-driven blues in which Rebennack sounds threatening as he sings, “Ain’t never was, ain’t never gonna be another big shot like me.”
I didn't mean to be away for so long, but the last couple of months have been a bit strange.
When I realized that something was seriously wrong this morning, I was crushed. The sleep deprivation and overwhelming amount of worry was a bad combination and I was a mess. Dr. King suggested that I go home and get some rest and our nurse Katie offered to call me if there was any changes.
When asked by them if he would like to play.
It had started six months ago with a simple phone call...
the pearl on the cuff is from making memories
Spring shows us that life is truly a constant beginning, a constant opportunity, a constant springtime. We need only to learn to look once again at life as we did as children, letting fascination and curiosity give us welcome cause to look for the miraculous hidden among the common.
As they are different breeds of hens, they have different shell colour (the inside is the same colour, a beautiful orange, and tastes wonderful). Perfect for "eggy soldiers", my favourite comfort food!
I stamped the tree image, first by inking it up with Versamark ink, then right into Black ink, then onto the cardstock. I then clear embossed it.
You don’t have to use raw honey and raw tahini in this recipe, but it does make a difference on the health end of things. If cost and/or availability is an issue, just use whatever you have to get the green in ya! No more excuses!
Some idiot spent the entire morning driving around and around the neighbourhood where I work. What gave me this nervous twitch was the fact that said idiot chose to drive around and around in an ice cream van.
Online, it seems I am different. I let my hair down and my quirks are all visible. I have been lectured by many about the dangers of sharing too much. I have even been victim of some not so kind harassment because of my over-sharing. At times, I have thought about backing off and being more reserved with what I blab about online, but in the end, I like being who I am. If others don't like it, that is their problem. I know who I am, do you?
LEVITICUS 25:36
Wire – Adapt (Pink Flag)
Hurriedly She pulled up the bag and with trembling fingers opened it.
80 Possession – AS Byatt *
Well, I’m not really an old man. Baby Boomers will never admit to being “old.” I’m seasoned and mature. Not too terribly weathered. Lots of good years left. So no, not old. But then again, there ain’t no hip hop on my iPod (but hey, at least I have an iPod and ditched my 8-track and Walkman already!)
Republican candidates received at least three times more cash than Democratic candidates. Top Congressional recipients include:
she might have had paperwork in her lap......
Some of the lands include StoryLand (for ages 3-5), AdventureLand (ages 5-8), MarineLand (ages 5-8), FutureLand (ages 9-12), and Poseidon's Hangout (ages 9-12). There are other lands that would work for children of all ages- like Uncle Milton's Amazing ScienceLand- I think this was designed just for my daughter!
I worked as Food Roots’ first intern last year, and it was an amazing experience. You can find the full description and application on the website or by clicking here. I highly encourage you to apply! I’m happy to help with any inquires about the position. Just email slowfooduo@gmail.com if you want some application help or more information.
6. No jr.’s for boys. My husband gets mad about this but I hate, hate, hate, hate, hate, it. EVERYONE in my family has done this, with the exception of my dad. I feel like for one the child doesn’t get their own identity at all. I have cousins who are in their 30s-50s still be called little (insert name here). GRR! It drives me BSC. I have no idea why. I know most people say every man wants a jr. I get that guys but he is still your son, no matter what. If his name was crayon, he’s still your son. He will also carry on your last name so there’s that argument as well.
McGee is scheduled to appear in Georgetown Town Court May 9.
My friend Emma is in a boot. Stress fracture in her foot. But not no ordinary stress fracture, at least not no more. This injury normally presents as a barely visible hairline crack. Her foot, she is informed, looks more like a splintered piece of wood. Why? Because she trained on it for three months. This is the running equivalent of injecting yourself in the groin, enduring extreme pain in search of that just one more big rush. She may never run again. Foolish? If you like. Understandable? Oh yeah. That running, that's some good shit.
There perhaps has never been a Tennessee Vol football player as polarizing to his own fan base as Arian Foster. Forget the fact that he finished his career as a Vol with just a little more than a hundred yards shy of being the all-time leading rusher in Tennessee history. We all remember the perceived selfish insular behavior, rumored faked injuries, and fumbles — oh the fumbles. Even though Foster only lost five fumbles on a school-record 650 rushing attempts, all five occurred at game-changing locations/times. Games against Penn State, Florida, UCLA, and Auburn still burn darkly in the memory. The slings and arrows with their ultra-sharp edges rained down on Arian like an Oklahoma hailstorm.
I wonder what you're up to these days.
Smarty Pants...well, as always, he is the one w/ the least 'growth'. He went from a size 3 to a size 4. Still, some growth.
1) Jets faucets- forcefully massage your body.
In fact, he is a very affectionate and loving boy.
Card is from stash, backing paper is from echo park sweet summertime set.
the clouds they prefer
This is the picture I get when I think about permanent life change. It is a pitched battle of the enlightened self of organization and new habits against the darkened self of short-term gratification and old habits. Or to put it in a decidedly spiritual fashion… it is our war against sin. (Non-Christians, please keep it down, I’m trying to make the point, just transcend the cosmology and you’ll get it.)
Grandpa is helping on the end down there (:)
anonyma (obs) n; showy woman of easy morals. Almost anyone in Heat mag, then? Great word—let’s bring it back at once. I want to see it in a newspaper article about, say, a Manhattan socialite madam.
Sunday: linguine with Alfredo sauce, stuffed clams, green beans, sliced fruit
Not one man approached me first....I made all of the effort....where are all of the MEN? And, no, it's not any harder for them than it is for me to make the first move. I am, at heart, an old fashioned girl and I was just thinking, maybe there was a gentleman cowboy out there, looking for me, too.
Wally Lowe, Businessman, Christian Recovery Resource Center, Vero Beach, Florida
And submerged.
Linking with the parties located on the lower right of my sidebar.
**NOTE***
First, I would take down the blue striped curtains, stretch them over wood frames, and hang them behind each bed. The picture above looks like they are above the beds, but they would stretch from the floor to nearly the ceiling. In the middle of the canvas I would hang the two orange canvases I made for the boys in the last house; they say "You are awesome" and "I love you a bushel and a peck".
The Dream Team vs. LG
Claims that she will have a penis
-The Bangles
4). Matt Kalil, OT to Minnesota. Again, right guy, right team, wrong order of pick. No surprise here, Viking QB Christian Pounder must be protected from being “pounded!” Kalil will be looked to for help in that area. Another very good use of a 1st. round pick.
Whether English-style liberal democracy can arrive in the Arab Muslim world is debatable. It is by no means agreed upon whether it should arrive there. Either way, the above would seem to indicate that these populations interact with their own members in a way that is fundamentally differently than the English. Pryce-Jones:
Charlie Signature
Sift the flour, sugar, cocoa, baking soda, baking powder, and salt into the bowl of a stand mixer fitted with a paddle attachment and mix on low speed until combined. In another bowl, combine the buttermilk, oil, eggs, and vanilla. With the mixer on low speed, slowly add the wet ingredients to the dry. With mixer still on low, add the coffee and stir just to combine, scraping the bottom of the bowl with a rubber spatula. Pour the batter into the prepared pans and bake for 20 to 23 minutes, until a cake tester comes out clean. I made some mini cupcakes as well, and they baked for about 18 minutes.
Yesterday there were strange warm winds and to me it said there was literally change in the air. Warm currents from who knows where have found the Marietta and El Morro islands. It has to be coming from Hawaii because anything comind down from the north is cold, cold, cooooold! Now I can´t tell you why t oday was different from the previous days but I do know this, if you are in PV and you want to boat some nice sized, fierce Gamefish, now would be a good time to dip into the piggy bank or your wifes wallet and grab that untouched credit limit… Just remember I am a two time divorcee and I may not be the best person for adive when it comes to the fair sex. So when you tell your wife ¨But Stan Said it OK to do this¨ remember this. It´s always cheaper to keep her! Believe me…
I tried to ink up the edges really well too so those wouldn't get etched. I stuck a piece of duct tape to the back and really stuck it down by rubbing it with something (I don't remember what), to keep the back from getting etched. (Worked like a charm.) I donned my protective gear:
Cougars are predators - the top of the food chain - and their actions are often unpredictable. We have little understanding about what might trigger an attack, but following these general guidelines will reduce the risk of cougar conflict and prepare you in the unlikely event of an attack.
There is a dichotomy at the heart of this discussion, and it can lead us to make an inaccurate assumption about self-publishing and mainstream publishing. Lulu has taken a step closer to the traditional world of publishing by taking on the wider marketplace, and the traditional world of publishing has begun to re-evaluate its own publishing models and taken a step closer to embracing some of the components of the self-publishing fraternity. Some might say never the twain shall meet, but it is discussions like this which come from the inevitable collision and consummation of all publishing into one entity. We are seeing the Lulu marketplace as a platform where self-published author collides with traditional author. The glare of the headlights shows us that an author is an author and a published book is a published book. It is just that some authors and their books are more equal than others. There is nothing new in this - it has being going on in the traditional world of publishing for decades.
The link gadget will close on January 31st at 11.59pm CST.
What are they scared of?
New Albanian - Thunderfoot, New Albany
Threads: Suggested WDW floss
"G'night Amber" . . .
Maps & Atlases will embark on a headlining tour this spring in support of Beware & Be Grateful, their new LP which debuted at #6 last week on Billboard's Alternative New Artist Chart and was the #1 added record at CMJ. The tour kicks off in their hometown, with a May 11th show at the Metro in Chicago, and wraps up on June 19th at Amsterdam Hall in St. Paul. The band recently returned from a successful European tour, which followed a short tour down to SXSW in March.
“Get out of my way GB, I need to get my car keys,” he panted.
Here are the amazing designers I am so fortunate to work with on this new adventure:
It’s also worth discussing the biggest difference between Doctor Who and Coronation Street. It is, perhaps surprisingly, not the existence of aliens and time travel. Rather it is that Doctor Who is thoroughly middle class and Coronation Street is thoroughly working class. This is particularly clear when you look at the cast making up the ostensible Davison soap: a noblewoman, a boy computer genius, a cricketeer, and an Australian stewardess. Tegan is the closest thing the series has to working class, and her foreignness and exotic job mitigate strongly against that.
Geographic Difference Three subspecies categories change in several people. A “northwestern” team is small and dark-backed, with small shiny side edgings, and flanks intensely laundered buffy tan. An “interior western” team is large and pale-backed, with wide shiny side edgings, and light buffy factors and flanks. An “eastern” team is diverse, but its subspecies are generally advanced between the other 2 categories in size, night of back, size of shiny side edgings, and wealth of strong rinse on the flanks.
A great deal of focus has been given to the contents of the briefcase in the movie. In part, I think this lies with the deviations in form talked about earlier. The forms are not what we expect, there must be some explanation for this, and it lies with what is in the briefcase. Again, I think this is a mistake – the forms are altered for the same reasons of pleasure that the forms are played with in a comedy sketch or a cartoon.
'ESCAPE!'
When the defense needed a stop, he shouted "Hunker down!" When the opponent scored he talked about "our hearts were torn out and bleeding." When Herschel Walker ran over defenders on his first carry, Munson did indeed finish the call with the now famous: "My God, a freshman."
Since Rousseau and Kant, there have been two schools of liberalism, which may be distinguished as the hard-headed and the soft-hearted. The hard-headed developed, through Bentham, Ricardo, and Marx, by logical stages into Stalin; the soft-hearted, by other logical stages, through Fichte, Byron, Carlyle, and Nietzsche, into Hitler. This statement, of course, is too schematic to be quite true, but it may serve as a map and a mnemonic… A man’s ethic usually reflects his character, and benevolence leads to a desire for the general happiness. Thus the men who thought happiness the end of life tended to be the more benevolent, while those who proposed other ends were often dominated, unconsciously, by cruelty or love of power.
Suzanne may or may not know it, but she is a Plejaran soul and half Plejaran physically. This is the basis for why the grays are interested in her.
She stayed in that spot, her pew by the sea,
I have never asked anybody to pay my student loan debt for me, and I will pay it down someday, even if I have to eat ramen noodles for the rest of my life. I was willing to undertake my studies at any cost and at any degree of personal risk because I believe in God and I am convinced that I am doing what God is calling me to do. If you read the New Testament, you will find a great deal about how people are called to give up everything they own – houses and wealth and family and respectibility and everything else – to do whatever it is that God calls them to do. I am not brave and no longer optimistic, but I have tried to take God at his word.
The agreement included a decision to reduce the international filing fee under the PCT by 5% (this means that the international filing fee will fall from 1,400 SFr to 1,330 SFr) and to increase the reduction from 75% to 90% for countries whose per capita national income is below US$3,000, as well as to Antigua and Barbuda, Bahrain, Barbados, Libyan Arab Jamahiriya, Oman, Seychelles, Singapore, Trinidad and Tobago and the United Arab Emirates. This fee reduction will be effective from 1 July 2008.
We'll let you know what we think when we're finished. So far, he's off to a good start.
Evening Everybody,
Series: The Agency, Book 3
And while I have been feeling a bit stormy recently, I am trying to remind myself to keep it light and to not take life so seriously.
Democrats are trying to distance themselves from senior Democrat and Obama strategist Hillary Rosen’s attack on women and on motherhood. It’s a tough sell: Hillary Rosen has visited the Obama White House 35 times, versus only 16 times for energy Secretary Steven Chu, only 9 times for CIA director David Petraeus, and interestingly only 6 times for Joe Biden.
John Brennan, the U.S’s top counterterrorism official, formally admitted that the United States engages in attacks using “drones”. Brennan argued that the drone programme is “legal”, “ethical” and “wise”. He said ”President Obama has instructed us to be more open with the American people about … using remotely piloted aircraft.”
What do you think? Is this an example of building beautifully?
M. Mother’s name: Janice
Fashion may not solve global crisis and nor does it claim to (though it can be valuable to help rebuild psychological confidence - as explored by Linda Grant in 'The Thoughtful Dresser'). In fact, it is one of the many means we use to distract ourselves from harsher realities – in the same vein as reading a book or enjoying good food. Why then the criticism reserved for fashion alone?
Tasty Tidbits from The Word Chef
Knowing, getting informed,knowledge,awareness are the basics of survival. In India we face so many issues and problems mainly due to lack of information.Carelessness and taking things for granted have caused serious trouble in our society.
"What are you going to do, baby? What are you ... doing?"
but remember....keep it Clean and Simple!
WOW that was an overwhelming response to last month's giveaway! THANK YOU all :) Welcome to all my new followers and I hope to drop over your blogs when I can too :)
I don't know if I can accurately describe Max. My vet told me he had more character than any cat he's ever seen. Anyone who spent time around Max loved him. You had to. He didn't give you a choice. If you sat down, you were petting him, and your lap now became his. You could toss him down 50 times, and 50 times, he would jump right back up.
her dismount twirls
2--My happy and joyful heart.
So then, given the obvious improvement in welfare that sanctuary represents, why has the AZA reacted so negatively? The answer is simple. Profit. Elephants are big money for zoos and collaborating research institutions, and zoos can ensure continuing profit by making more elephants via breeding programs. It is these programs that reveal the raw darkness of the captive industry.AZA openly states that one of its goals is “to establish a sustainable captive elephant herd in North America.” [2] [4] The Pittsburgh Zoo is now involved in an international project, “Project Frozen Dumbo,” an effort to establish North America’s first elephant sperm bank. First, scientists extract semen by masturbating a bull elephant. [5] [6] They then artificially inseminate female elephants. [7] In plain, less euphemistic language, male and female elephants are raped in order to produce more elephants. Chai is one such victim.
Ari is still bad-*ss but there’s this instance that i found her incredulous. idiotic, even. Sigh. i would like my heroine to be confident and skilled in battle, but i do not want her going into one without proper arsenal. Ari, you’re fighting a goddess (Athena, no less!), for goodness sake. The least you can do is make the capturing a little difficult. i find it rather insulting to have Athena slaughter you at her silver plate because of your stupidity.
But the other roommates kept laying and laying.
There's been a lot going on in our little family lately. House stuff, bronchitis for the big man, fever for the little man. One stressed out tired Mama. When everything settles I'll be sure to write more. I have so much to write, so much to share...
me, me, me, me, me, me, me, me, Israel… that is how psalm 25 reads to me – starts off really good and positive and kind of like the sunday picture of a christian – look at me God, everything is together, You are good, i can sing all the words in all the worship songs and even believe that i believe them and You’re great and thanks for all You’ve done and You’re control and You’ve done some great stuff in the past and everything you do is amazing and i’m done at church and i’m driving home and i reach verse 16 and my mask comes off and i have a fight with my wife and i can’t believe the weekend is finished and i have to go to work on monday and look at all these problems i have God and HELP ME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
This Sexual Assault Awareness Month, it is important to take some time to educate yourself about all the different types of sexual aggression and find out what you can do to be part of the solution. As SAPA would say: no Zebras, no excuses.
Pastor Platt concludes his book by presenting for us “A Better Way.” He writes, “If eleven disciples on a mountain in Galilee were enough to launch the gospel to the ends of the earth, then a church with a handful of members can spread the gospel in and beyond a community.” And he asks the question that not only needs to be asked but needs to be answered by demonstration of our lives in this world and that question is, “What if each of us were actually making disciples who were making disciples who were making disciples?” “It’s a Radical” question or thought to be sure but just for the sake of considering it…What if? Just imagine what God would and could do through us as his Disciples if we lived our lives so radically.”
/opt/VRTS/man/man1m
This is when I ask for them on purpose, only to be told 'Poppadum not having, sir' therefore providing my queue to cause an almighty fuss about how any self-respecting Keralite cold store would never run out of poppadum. I mean, what kind of supply chain management do they have around here?
Young People were ‘apprenticed’ or ‘waited’ on experienced workers, such as Mary (Female, 10 years, AC/MR, with Betsey Moss). Betsey Moss was recorded as (Female, 25 years, Seamstress and like Mary is also AC/MR). Simon Fraser (male, 11 years, Carpenter) was also ‘apprenticed’ and worked with five adult Carpenters. Working alongside these five Carpenters, Simon Fraser learnt the knowledge and skills of becoming and being an experienced Carpenter. A further example is taken from the community of four Stock Keepers with responsibilities for teaching and guiding the four young apprenticed Stock Minders to becoming and being experienced Stock Keepers.
Sticking to Darwin, and other scientific facts; the principle of entropy holds, by approximation, that any disorder in a closed system (remember that ‘God is dead’, ‘there is nothing outside the text’, etc) will inevitably affect (spread to) the whole system. Seeing that ‘our’ (humanity’s) original disorder, i.e. ‘we’ all need natural resources to survive – in a ‘closed’ world (sysyem) in which their availability is limited – was always bound to affect the whole system, makes the notion of independently existing a-historical insular cultural worlds (cocoons) even more absurd. In short; we were bound to get ‘inside’ each other’s cocoons – whether we like it or not. And one only has to look at the inevitable cultural exchanges (be it linguistic, scientific, etc.) and adaptive measures (on the part of weaker ‘cocoons’) to realize that we are definitely all sharing the same world. So much for certain relativist assumptions underpinning cultural relativism!
Born: 1700
God hid the truth from those who would do harm to His eternal purpose. We see this fact brought out in 1 Corinthians 2:7-8.
While Gemini energy is aligned with the Masculine, and Virgo energy is aligned with the Feminine, Aquarius is androgynous. It is too inclusive and unconventional to change one gender over the other. And it is that welcoming inclusivity, along with their lightning minds and idealism, that is so beautiful about Aquarius.
If you want a glimpse into a day in the life of these two children a few days later, read Anna's Post Here. If you click on that link be prepared to have your heart changed. I know my words alone cannot convey the magnitude of the sadness and reality of this situation, but I hope you can get a glimpse into why my heart aches so much for our orphans.
She sits in the middle of her room
The excitement of a first sighting was over-shadowed by our awe at the quickness of the dramatic display of the falcon’s aerobatics. After the pigeon was taken, we had a chance to watch the feeding bird over several minutes, but the essential experience was our brief glimpse of the physics-defying flight of the plunging bird. What a wonderful moment!
When I was leaving Russia — very reluctantly — in 1991, the country was still called the Soviet Union, and if anyone at that time told me that the USSR’s days were numbered, I would’ve laughed in his face.
If a definable group of people – let us say members of Mensa – are less than 2% of the population in a way that can be defined by allegedly scientific testing, then they are freaks.
As the family of five clustered in the glare of the headlights, Ariela stepped around the end of the barn. Her hands were empty, with the exception of her radio. She was dressed in pajama bottoms and a tank top.
Has Solzhenitsyn lost his moral authority since returning to Russia? This is a question David Remnick asked the author Lev Timofeyev in his book Reporting: Writings from The New Yorker to which he received the following answer:
Remember these names and what they support. Otherwise any cute "protest" you're stating today will mean absolutely nothing. Vote against them next time you have the chance. Get rid of them if you value your rights as an American citizen.
studies show that consistent consumption of chocolate milk after sustained exercise dramatically lower the levels of creatine kinase (an indicator of muscle damage). This is largely due to the ample amount of protein found in chocolate milk, which helps repair damaged muscle and build new, lean muscle, Chocolate milk is also loaded with Calcium, Potassium and Magnesium plus chocolate milk tastes infinitely better than most other recovery sports drinks.
I'd like to see the letter Nordstrom responded to. I wonder if the person who wrote the letter to Wilder objected to more than just that one passage? That passage appears very early in the book. In the copy I'm looking at right now, it is the fifth paragraph of the book. Perhaps the letter writer read that far and quit reading to compose her letter. I'll write to Leonard Marcus to see if he has more info. He is the editor of Dear Genius.
4) Beware of these deadly mistakes: relying too much on others, waiting for or expecting perfection, overthinking, feeling obligated to finish what you’ve started, and working with the wrong materials. Any one of them will undermine your best efforts. If you’re stuck, look at each of these to see if they’re holding you back.
“Humph. I see that I was not understood. Yes? Let me elucidate. The Fantastical, Aerial, International, Reasonably Inconspicuous, Emancipation Squads , or shall I say F.A.I.R.I.E.S.? have accepted you into their organization. You asked. You were answered.” The branch attempted a smile, but looked impatient instead.
In recent years, some head coaches have showed blatant disregard for the NCAA’s rules. Coaches around the nation have been caught and punished for a variety of violations. These violations range from providing players with improper benefits to smaller things like contacting a player during a certain period. In 2010, Tennessee head coach Bruce Pearl was suspended for the first eight SEC games because he lied to the NCAA about hosting a recruit in his home for a barbeque.
Embacorpaz, Women of the Consensus, Colombia;
Let me see some hands! Who’s ever had Pulled Pork in South Carolina, or parts of Georgia? Okay, raise those hands high! So those of you who did, what’s the most distinctive difference between Carolina Pulled Pork and everywhere else? You! Way in the back! Speak up I can’t hear you. What? Bingo!!! That’s right, South Carolina and parts Georgia use a yellow mustard based BBQ sauce.
I am happy to note that the Times obituary of February 23 was, as is not always the case, laudably unstinting as written by Douglas Martin, and provided a commendable overview of an exemplary career. I knew Rosset only slightly, encountering him last at a dinner party chez Larry Rivers, which I remember chiefly for having said strongly negative things about my ex-student Harold Brodky to a woman who turned out to be his wife.
There is a certain peace in having the house all to myself (the malis and cooks and bhaiya are the critters that dont count)
But when David Lebovitz, chef extraordinaire, suggested that Blair and I, fellow Davidites, join the ranks of the San Fransisco V-L's, I almost wished I did play for the other team just to see his winning smile broaden.
Karen Johnson has been drawing all of her life. She has worked on the feature film, “Ferngully The Last Rainforest” and has created animations for Disney, Fisher Price and Mattel. She has illustrated several children’s books and is currently teaching animation at a college in Wisconsin. She started Karen’s Doodles so she could share her whimsical
PLEASE, he needs to be RESCUED before it's too late. Right, now before he is transferred would be a wonderful time to bring him home, so he never has to know the horrors of the institution.
Now I know I did promise to announce my Craft it Forward in my next post, but I want to let you know about it in a post all of it's own. As I'll have my teacher head on for the next three days nothing else will be happening in my Bobo Bun world so I'll be back by Thursday I think it's safe to say.
-Does she talk to her good friends about you? You may not know her good friends
OR If you are using milk powder ,then bring 4 cups of milk to boil and mix the dry milk powder in half a cup of hot milk and stir into the boiling milk.
The six Rangers broke their squad formation and headed for whatever cover they could find just as Wei launched the first of the UH-60′s Hellfire missiles in their general direction. The missile flew wide of the Rangers’ positions and struck the last Blackhawk in the line of four on the runway.
When they finally came home, a few hours later, they discovered one started right at their house.
Here's that link again so you can sign up to download his free chapter and begin doing what you need to do achieve what you want to achieve: Download your free chapter now.
I've only had one child in cloth diapers. I think having two kids in diapers is going to present challenges whether you use cloth or disposables, but I would definitely use cloth if I have another baby before my first is potty trained. I'm thinking about how much it would cost to have two kids in disposable diapers at the same time. That would get very expensive! I know diaper laundry would add up faster, but I think we could handle it.
Ask your child the reasons that kids give for excluding him or her. Use those reasons so your child can practice persisting. For example, if the reason is, "You're not good enough," your child can practice saying "I'll get better if I practice!" If the reason is, "There are too many already," your child might practice saying, "There's always room for one more." If the reason is, "You cheated last time," your child might practice saying, "I did not understand the rules. Let's make sure we agree on the rules this time."
Every parent knows about sleep deprivation. You can't live through the baby-and-toddler years without missing a few nights' sleep. Or in my case, since neither of my kids slept through 'til they were three-and-a-half, 365 nights' sleep in each of the first few years! I learned I can still function (though admittedly not very well or very happily) on as little as four hours' sleep a night.
Some of the distilleries, unhappy with this particular turn of events, now use plastic glasses. Sometimes you can't tell they're plastic until you have invested the time in line to get one. This disappoints the mob and makes it surly.
But then the thread package arrived in the mail--which was totally amazing that it took only 2 days to get here from the west-mid-west--and we had to spend quite a bit of time oohing and aahing over the Aurifil Color Card and the 13 or so spools of 12 wt Aurifil cotton that I snagged at $3.60 per spool (even the hubs wanted to know why I just didn't buy every single color she had at that price).
A very special thank you to all of the heroes who are collectively the United States Armed Forces, and their families. We owe you for our maintained peace, order, and freedom. Where so much more is deserved, we offer a warm and sincere "Thank You". Thank you also Monique and Alexa Peters for contributing this wonderful little story, and thank you Melissa Peterson, for helping Alexa breathe life into the pages.
THE KNOCKOUT is first and foremost an Arbuckle comedy, one in which Chaplin puts in what basically amounts to a supporting appearance. A fairly elaborate two-reel affair, the film begins with Arbuckle engaging in extended, roughhouse slapstick with a couple of tramps posing as pugilists to earn some extra cash. Arbuckle himself goes in to the ring to fight Cyclone Flynn (Edgar Kennedy) who offers to split the purse if Fatty throws the fight. He refuses, and the big fight is the highlight of the second reel. To add to the pressue, sheriff Mack Swain informs Fatty that he’s betting heavily on him, “so win or I’ll kill you.” Chaplin appears as the referee – taking a bow before the audience prior to falling backward in the ring, and accidentally taking a punch or two to the face when moving between the two pugilists. Things build to a frenzied climax when Fatty, getting knocked out and losing the match, angrily whips out two six-shooters, which he begins firing into the audience and chasing the rival boxers! The Keystone cops get word that a maniac is on the loose, and give chase with typically ineffective results. The chase leads the men through a high society party, in which they tear through in the middle of a musical performance. Finally, Fatty and the cops engage in a rather unbalanced match of tug-of-war, which ends with Fatty dragging the entire of team policemen down the street.
The Master Cleanse had a number of purposes, I could do a modified version of the spiritual fast my parents did, but for longer and still be functional for work. The other reason besides wanting to show God I’m serious about getting focused on whatever is to come my way in the next year, I won’t front. Finding out you can drop a few pounds does make it even more appealing.
As I passed by the living room I glanced in the window. Granny Gertie was peacefully sitting on the couch, blanket over her lap, book in her hand.
And then you have a sentence with 34 count 'em 34! words. In other words: a lonnnng ass sentence. There's a place for long ass sentences. Treatises on Faulkner come to mind. Generally they are NOT a good stylistic choice for a 250 word total query letter. Short and sweet is good.
As anyone who reads this blog knows, there is going to be a 'phonics screening' test this June for all Year 1 pupils in state schools including Academies. The pass mark is going to be 32 words correctly read out of 40. Families of children failing will be informed that they have failed.
This painting has sold.
Her hair was smooth and dark against the white of the pillow and her lips were bruised as if some kiss had longed to punish them.
According to the St. Lucie County Sheriff’s Office, Daniel Lee Carmichael, 43, used the ID of his friend of 30 years during hospital visits, reports TCPalm.com.
them. This album was released in 1980, and probably is still
This approach not only to religion, but all other aspects of one's life as well is very good advice to follow.
Based on a vast amount of research (which consists mainly of mentally cataloging the Facebook and Twitter updates of my friends), I’ve determined that there is a definite line in the sand when it comes to readers (especially readers of YA and fantasy books):
comments I'd go ahead and give a bunch of freebies out.)
it waves back and forth.
I'm hoping to self-publish another book soon-ish, and when I think about all the work I have to do for that, it stresses me out. I have to edit it a ton, and I know it will still have errors, which frustrates me so much I want to rip out all my hair. I have to format it, and there's a good chance it will still turn out wonky on a page or two. I have to do the cover, which means getting the title and lettering just right, and that always gives me a headache. Plus about a hundred other little things that don't seem like much but add up to being a whole lot.
"We do not remember days; we remember moments."
It's the first challenge of the month, which means we have a new sponsor. Please help me welcome Fresh Brewed Designs!
For someone just wanting to trade in and out of gold without carrying the asset, it’s a low-cost way of doing it. But without the leverage, you really need a lot of capital to carry any sizeable positions and you can probably just do better playing the currencies.
As it continued to get warmer, I was really tempted to take off my tank top and run in my sports bra. However, I remembered that the more skin I had exposed to the sun, the worse off I was going to be later down the road. I kept finding neighborly people with their sprinklers running so I could get my tank top damp every so often and keep my temperature down while keeping my top on.
*) Authorize Muslim-only neighbourhoods or events.
“Not, Charlie. Just asking why you’ve decided to ACT stupid asking for a stake change when you’re stuck.”
Scripture is full of stories of people who had to wait on the Lord to see His plans and promises come to fulfillment.
Much of generation and transmission is 30-50 years old. Decide what we want to do next.
One debt collector, a few years ago, once he had been informed by Telstra that the relevant debt was indeed a mistake and that I didn't have to pay it, said to me, 'I'm sorry, I didn't know.' I replied, 'yes, and you didn't care, did you?' All that time he was being so demanding and insisting and intimidating toward me, he had never bothered to take any steps to be sure that I actually was a guilty party before threatening legal proceedings, in a direct reversal of the supposed 'innocent until proven guilty' philosophy of our society's legal system. Seeing as it was later established that I had never incurred a debt in the first place, the actions taken by the debt collectors amount to nothing more than unjust accusations and harassment - actions that are punishable by law, if people who aren't employed by debt collectors commit them. He just took instructions from his computer screens and pleaded the old excuse of war criminals everywhere - I'm just doing my job.
on my worst enemy but it is a crazy world and you
“The next point of interest on the Coffee Road after leaving McCranie’s postoffice was ‘Sharpe’s Store’ which was in present Brooks County and situated some fifteen miles westward from old Franklinville [ approximately 25 miles southwest of the point where the Knights settled at the present day site of Ray City, GA]. Hamilton W. Sharpe, then a young man hardly in his twenties, had come down from Tatnall County over the Coffee Road, and decided to locate near the home of Hon. Sion Hall at whose home the first court in Lowndes was held a few months afterwards. So young Sharpe built a small store building out of logs near the Sharpe home; that was in 1826. He along with others expected that the permanent county-seat would be established there.
How a widely recognized news agency like the BBC can get a simple fact like that wrong is mind boggling. Frankly, we're more shocked then Peter Gabriel's monkey.
There are a few separate steps with some waiting involved, but I assure you- these are worth the wait. I made the cheesecake portion the night before I served them (they spent the night firming up in the freezer) and did the chocolate dipping the next morning. The dipping brought back some serious memories for me from my teenage years. I was in a girls' youth group called Job's Daughters (any former Jobies out there??) and every spring, we made chocolate covered peanut butter eggs as a fundraiser. It's funny that my muscles still remember how to dip things in chocolate after all these years! The secret is to use a fork for dipping (and if you're doing a lot of dipping, take an old fork and bend back the two middle tines- that's the best tool for dipping, hands down).
By God's design, we are a skin kaleidoscope
Later, trying to cheer him up, I flew his plastic Superman figure past his face. I missed and poked him in the eye with Superman's much-too-hard foot. Some Superhero. Some Supermom. Oops. Hugs and apologies from me in abundance.
Incredibly sweet, right? It made me suck in my breath and of course, cry. It was from a BFF's sis-in-law and it was pretty amazing, and it made my day. I shared in the moment with another BFF who spent the night and was enjoying coffee talk with me. So for those of you out there who are doing your part to keep the conversation going about IF...bravo! We're doing it!
Eslea is ready. She has been practicing her crawling all week. Determined to keep up with us walkers. I'm bringing her stroller...just in case.
Imagine my happiness when, during my last trek to the Asian supermarket in Southeast Paris, I came across multicolored tapioca pearls. Teeny, tiny, tapioca pearls. In French, they're called perles de Japon, and since pretty much anything that comes out of Japan is cute, I'm a taker for the French name.
foreclose and otherwise vacate said occupant’s tail onto the street to wit and
'I am confident the actions we, and our cleaning contractor, are taking will return us to compliance by November 30.
Probably blogging has swallowed a good portion of that time so I'm going to be stricter with myself about that. I don't facebook much but I do like to play some games on the computer. My goal is to stop that. For May, my writing time is for writing.
Remember all those Seagal, Van Damme, Chan martial arts movies? Well, this has nothing to do with those. This post is about three lesser-known films that if you do remember, you will agree that they were very cool…at least at the time.
My Islam is Gabriel tap dancing on the open flames in a cave
I have a theory I’m developing here. I am fairly sure the landlord is involved in a few dodgy bits of business, and the way in which he has got R working for him sounds like it might be one of them. So who benefits from it? Well, the landlord does. But so does the construction company – R remains in the country and on hand for whenever they need him to work again, and with his head just above water financially. The construction company is not doing anything wrong, as such, insofar as they are probably abiding by all the labour laws. It’s just that the labour laws in contemporary Britain fuck over the little man, putting him in a position of precarity where he is at the beck and call of the employer.
The cover for Doctor Who Adventures 205 has now been revealed and shows what can be expected from the issue. The magazine comes with an ultra-tricky monster test, a Silurian wordsearch, and some secret backstage photos from the filming of Series 6. There are also loads of puzzles and prizes, as well as a brand new comic strip featuring the Eleventh Doctor and Amy Pond!
January 2012 - Page Loads 31,359 Unique Visits 21,627
“Henceforth there will be such a oneness between us that when one weeps the other will taste salt.”—Author Unknown.
Salt and pepper to taste (I often add this to the egg before cooking)
I used to watch for the old man. I told Tim about him. When Tim took a day off to decorate, we watched for him together.
To grout, you use the same mixer thing that attached to the drill and water or grout enhancer. I got the enhancer ($5) because it's supposed to help reduce the possibility of mold:
In the opinion of the four men hustling back to their cabin … the U.N. troops had just made a huge mistake.
fight for precious little
I've mentioned I joined the Aspiring Artisan's Guild this past spring - a great group of like-minded Etsy shop owners looking to improve and grow our small businesses. It's a nice team - lots of helpful people, events, motivation, and a great sense of camaraderie (yes I had to look that up to spell but it was the best word).
יהי זכרם ברוך
And turning to my wife he said
Less prominent is deputy minister Adonis Georgiadis, who is famous for his televised rants against Muslims, immigrants, Jews and support for the military dictatorship that formerly governed Greece. Up until February the coalition could have included LAOS, or Popular Orthodox Rally, party leader Giorgos Karatzaferis, a one time body building xenophobe who once declared. “They say that to get ahead you have to be one of three things: a Jew, a homosexual, or a communist. We are none of these … Vote for a parliament without Masons, without homosexuals, without those dependent on Zionism.” Thankfully, support for LAOS has plummeted following their brief but toxic involvement in the grand coalition.
BBE: (hears the all-too-familiar tinkle) “Ahh!! What are you doing?!?!
Also fell in love with these little pine cones. Found these at a local flower shop.
The 3 start filling in Martha on how much of the ship has been zombified and how the few of them have found to deal with the zombies. Plot wise we're starting to get somewhere.
And I believe in you
A few drops yuzu (or a strip of lemon peel thinly peeled with a vegetable peeler or sharp knife)
Recipe :: Beet Carpaccio
The final straw for Gary was when his boss decided to lay off all the workers that Gary had employed for her and it was down to him to do it. He resigned, we moved out and all we could afford to rent was a bedsit in Guildford town centre. It was miserable. A tiny room in the attic of a tall building with shared bathroom. We had no money, but we did have each other and that’s what kept us going. In the end we decided to admit defeat. It felt that no matter what we did things kept going wrong and so we decided to move back to Kent and try a
Missions and bang-up battles are a acceptable accession to the Mario Kart mix.
Fun times in the bath with the Price Kids:
Catholic Institutions and Inerrancy
-Flavorful Minty Jeera Rice is ready to serve !!
In addition to the usual fruit and veg stands, chickens were being slaughtered before our eyes and bags of live guinea pigs were being bought and sold to the loudest bidder.
The Homestay programme was conceived to increase the participation of the rural population in the tourism sector.
Yikeeeeeeeeeees the days just flies by here, cant believe that Christmas is just around the corner, i have some serious Christmas shopping to do still!!
Each and every one of our pets had a pure heart and loved us. They are missed.
Not a remote control, you moron.
TV host Willie Revillame is taking a two-week break from television. TV5 can now remove the “Parental Guidance” sign on the TV screen.
The meeting took a lot longer then I thought it would, so I just ended up having to call out from work, which was probably better that way. My mind was definitely else where. I took care of some errands, but did get around to that pedicure. It was lovely by the way. It's also good I stayed home, as I had to go back over to see the speech people, because they have a new computer program that they are not used to yet, and it didn't print off one of a zillion consents I had to sign, so they called for me to come back and sign.
I had my father in mind as well because the Kindle has 'text to speech', so if I had a book he might like to 'hear' it read to him whilst I was staying at his house each week. Great idea, we can choose a male of female voice, slow, medium or faster...great. He can put his earphone on and plug that in as well so my husband and I can't hear.
Norwich 5/1(SkyBet), Draw 3/1(Boylesports), Chelsea 8/13 (PP/Bet365)
…unlike schoolwork, outdoor play can present physical dangers that you may find downright disturbing.
Is there anyone that fails
This evening I was able to add another run of 9.02 miles in 1:11:44. The run was on my regular route for Tuesday evenings. I was able to add a few more hills to the run which gave me a sense of accomplishment after completing the run.
1/4 cup whole milk
04. (announcer)
As I contemplate taking down the Christmas tree and all the decorations, packing and putting away, I wonder about the New Year and what it holds in store for me. What circumstances will I be a part of? What people will come into and or leave my life? How will the devil try to attack me this year? Don’t get me wrong, I’m not worrying, just pondering.
Nice little symbiotic family. Such cooperation. One goal – establishing the Khilafah.
Austin, TX 78701
Where: Indianapolis RAM Restaurant and Brewery
Essentially, in going public, Venizelos has trumped Merkel's hand, and then upped the stakes by declaring that all the demands set by the country's international lenders have now been met. In particular, leaders of both parties in the Papademos coalition, including conservative leader Antonis Samaras, have given written undertakings that the austerity measures will be implemented, election notwithstanding.
I’d been to the Norwegian capital a number of times before. Actually, it’s where Fiona and I first celebrated our engagement after hitchhiking around Scandinavia with no money for three weeks and figuring that if we could survive that, we might as well buy some rings.
I also have a brother that lives in the area too, so I called him to see if he may be the culprit. This conversation is also funny:
Scarf: Hermès
But whether or not this will actually this will happen within the well-meaning but slower, more corporate, conservative set-up of Molson Coors, I'm more doubtful about. Stuart won't hang around if he's just brewing Doom Bar on a bigger kit, and if he does eventually jump ship, you can bet your life it will be to start something new with a greater focus on innovative beers. So the craft beer drinker still wins out.
Which leads me to ..
Is it All in the Name?
I would love to see how anyone else’s turns out if you try it!!
It is hard to give credit to who's recipe this is because there are many similiar recipes out there in cyber recipe land. I did not make this up (just a little tweeking, maybe) and was adapted from the many recipes I found on the net.
I’ve mentioned several times how much Betsy and I like going to Mount Nebo in Arkansas. We always stay in a beautiful rustic cabin on the edge of the mountain where we can enjoy the fantastic views.
Cut prosciutto into chunks, trimming the visible fat. I would’ve liked these slices to be a bit thicker, but they worked out nicely.
I can't get a crisp correlation, maybe because I buy at the highest levels so rarely. A MaxMara coat delighted for nearly a decade, but for the move, I shed bags of Level 3 without a twinge.
2 cucurbit
So, after making our own Goldfish crackers, I started to look around the house at all the other foods my little ones eat in a light-speed fashion. (ie: I buy them on Monday and they are gone by Wednesday.) 'Nilla wafers. Every night the Littlests have one after bath and before bedtime. There's just something cozy about a "cookie" and milk before bed. Or, so I am projecting onto them! :)
It was all a bit ominous they way she was so brief yet confident, but we followed regardless. Opening the door to the office, she introduced us to Backpack. He had been living on the street for months. When the shelter found him on the side of the road, he had nearly neutered himself on a fence, or had been nearly neutered in a fight… not that it mattered which. Soon as they found him, they took him in for emergency surgery. He was staying in the office while he recovered. It was the saddest story I’d ever heard. But from the dogs demeanor, you’d never know that seven days earlier it was living on the street. This was my dog. This is my dog, Sam I Am:
Today I am thankful for a great training day.
Shaw GM. Adverse human reproductive outcomes and electromagnetic field: A brief summary of the epidemiologic literature. Bioelectromagnetics 2001; (Suppl. 5): S5-S18.
First we got to see C.S. Lewis' wardrobe which was handmade by his grandfather and also inspired the wardrobe in the book "The Lion The Witch And The Wardrobe". My kids really wanted to step inside and go to Narnia for the day, but they had to settle for just looking inside and touching the fur coats. There was also one of Lewis' desks that he had donated, which was neat to see.
2) For an extra entry, you can follow the My Memories blog, Facebook page, or Twitter stream. Just leave another comment letting me know if you've done this.
so that it would hide the dirt better!
A repost from my Tumblelog
If you've done this sort of thing before you know there's no way to really keep up with all the steps so I'll just list the items I used.
After discussing the issues of my posture, space, and hobbies with mother it was decided I needed some sort of proper sewing table. Remembering the Horn table my aunty has, I hastily searched for my dream to soon come true on eBay. There were three of the same kind, but I missed out on the first two. The third was my lucky day.
I’ve started to read the book, and it’s definitely going to be a personal classic for me and a turning point in my development as a solidly religious person firmly engaged in the body politic. I also have the privilege of attending a book talk/signing with him next week here in Philly.
"I don't know if I still belong in the police if this is the way they treat me.
Carlo Collodi
1 large tomatoe, diced
The pools are colder each day
I, ARSENIA CORONEL, being duly sworn in accordance with law do hereby declare and depose:
2. What is it with the left with these totalitarian wet dreams of blowing up Climate Change Deniers and sterilizing third world women? This keeps coming up, over and over, and the people who bring it up keep being invited to nice parties and everything. What, do lefties support genocide as long as the Correct™ Progressive™ incantations are pronounced before the bullet?
He opened his eyes, releasing the memory of Camille and ending his long embrace with Violet. Violet ran upstairs and brought her homework down. For the first time in many months, he sat with his daughter on the same couch watching television while she did her school assignments. He flipped channels to a hockey game and slid into a more comfortable lounging position. Violet remarked.
Most men, with an insignificant number of exceptions, are capable of this heroic loyalty. We women can call this out of our men. We don’t achieve this by nagging. We certainly don’t achieve it by competing with them over who makes the most money, or by keeping score with them on who does the most household chores. We need to build them up, as St. Paul says. Watch them sit up straighter and taller when we appreciate and admire them.
The killer shoes:
Dress: Black sleeveless dress with purple, pink & green floral prints from DOROTHY PERKINS
I tried, once again, to design a business card for my wife’s translation business (english-to-french) and, once again, I was unsuccessful.
Though tourism is not only fun but historic as well. Take a look at the tulsa oklahoma houses that was so close that only an acrobatic grab of a good arts education, few students attending Oklahoma City is fast becoming a destination for water-themed travel. With further developments likely to participate in a special grant program funded by the tulsa oklahoma cinemark that means fans can't expect to have passed through during this time in three weeks, the casino tulsa oklahoma with Texas No. 3 and Florida No. 4.
Furthermore, there are two bizarre translations of particular words in the Latin that sound awkward and even obscure: "consubstantial" and "was incarnate." The former is a translation of the word "consubstantialem" in the Latin, so it certainly resembles the Latin the most. But does that make it a better translation? Surely not. The first rule that every Latin translator learns is that often Latin words may look like certain long, rare English words -- but comprehensibility matters more. The same applies to "was incarnate." The whole reason why an English translation is used in the first place is so people can actually understand the Mass. For the average churchgoer "consubstantial" is no more comprehensible than "consubstantialem.” Ridiculous words defeat the point of a translation in the first place.
We’re all doing a little jig at the Graphic Universe office! The Ferret’s a Foot, the third book in the Guinea PIG, Pet Shop Private Eye series, has been nominated for an Eisner Award! Colleen Venable and Stephanie Yue’s book shares the spotlight with five other stellar titles in the category of “Best Publication for Kids (ages 8-12)”.
Our other hurdle came earlier in the trip. The project the Ferry family has undertaken has been life changing. The way that we dispose of our waste is different. The meals we make and the snacks in our cupboard are changed. Our food bill has fluctuated based on our educated choices. And, even our dinner table discussions and television programming have been altered. We are different – there is no way around that. I questioned (well, fretted) over how Andrew would react to these changes. With an ordinary, “one-week maximum stay” kind of houseguest, I would take the not so delicate approach of “suck it up”. You are a guest in my house and you will eat the food that we prepare. You will live like a Ferry. I don’t need a smile, but I expect respect.
For those of you who went to Sparkle, I hope you had a good time and I've been reading the posts about it here and there. Did I miss going? Yes and no. 'No' because if it was important enough to me, I'd push and make the effort to go. But, being a Dad, I like my weekends with my family and being away for the whole weekend would be too much. I guess I'm a cake-and-eat-it kinda guy. :-) Besides, that weekend felt far too hot to be glamorous. :-) So a nice to have, but I guess if you don't know, you don't miss out on it.
6. Roll out a ball of dough with a small rolling pin to a 5-inch circle the thickness of a nickel. Roll on one side only. Don’t turn over. Use enough flour to prevent sticking.
All told, Korean food to Korean American food is a movie to a pornography -- the entire endeavor is reduced to a single, crass purpose, which is achieved by artificial "enhancements." Yet Korean restaurants, even those only patronized by well-off Korean Americans, merrily stay in business. How?
because there will be no work happening while the kids are home.
In Britain, in March 1901, this brief scene was captured on film. Entitled The Death of Poor Joe - Joe being based on the crossing sweeper in Bleak House - it is now thought to be the earliest moving image reflecting a scene from a Dicken's novel.
Drake
I will have to order some more of this fabric I hope the girls have some more in stock.
Man oh man that is an amazing achievement in anyones books.
I'm sitting here today working out the merging of two blogs.
Here's a google map I did highlighting a few things to do -I'll be adding to it as I go along.
I have another child who I think truly believes that multiplication is straight from the devil! Is it???
So, check it out if you want to win stuff...otherwise more for me! ;)
“200 M.P.H.” is a fun, down to earth, entertaining movie, so I recommend it.
Tutorials - Here I will post some "How-To's" for you
“Never settle for less than the truth,” she told him. But when you don’t even know your real name, the truth gets a little complicated. It can nestle so close to home it’s hard to see. It can even flourish inside a lie. And as Chase Walker discovered, learning the truth about who you are can be as elusive–and as magical–as chasing fireflies on a summer night. A haunting story about fishing, baseball, home cooking, and other matters of life and death.
The red punchie is from Martha Stewart and the ric rac die is from PTI. Some vintage buttons with scrappers floss in them. the Enjoy is from SU with some Fern crinkle ribbon from A Muse. That skinny green organdy is from SU.
It was not easy understanding her when she was looking at us, let alone when she had her back to us.
- Don’t worry Party Time, - I said – with that money you got of my laptop we’ll fix her up good as new. Our uncle has told me in her day she was hot stuff. It was when she charging men to plug her did the looks start to fade, -
When the Schmidts rushed to the door of the corn crib Ariela was ready. The timing had been crucial and she’d pulled it off.
"no, i'm german, but my girlfriend is american."
About the Internships
Companions: The Doctor, Liz Shaw, The Brigadier.
A while back I read the Happiness Project and I learned something valuable (well a lot of things, but one pertaining to this subject). The author talks about how she remembers what made her happy when she was younger and she did it again as an adult. To test this out, I fingerpainted. It sounds silly, but it totally worked. The things that we had fun doing as kids, we can still enjoy as adults. And it can even help us feel like kids again, which is a fun and incredible feeling (especially when you feel weighed down by the adult responsibilities of life).
Helen - Moonstruck Creations
31 St. Andrews, Detroit, MI
Bertrand, J., Mars, A., Boyle, C., Bove, F., Yeargin-Allsopp, M., & Decoufle P. (2001). Prevalence of autism in a United States population: the Brick Township, New Jersey, investigation. Pediatrics, 108, 1155-61.
to run my machine.”
This week on #LFCRadio we are going to talk about Kids and Race.
I’ve of to say, it’s great! I’ve only used it briefly (mainly to have a quick look about and write this post), but the UI is simple and slick and adding posts is easy rather than the chore I was expecting.
bringing their blue temple domes painted with stars.
Lilith fled Eden, choosing exile over service to Adam. Only the two unicorns followed, her dearest friends, who stayed with her through the long lonely years. Lonely in no small part because the descendants of her rival, Eve, have shunned her. Many believe the lies spread about her being a mother of demons, a devourer of infants, but most don't even know she ever existed. 1300 years after the birth of Jesus of Nazereth, the eldest unicorn, one of the pair who followed her into exile, is dying. Immortal, Lilith knows that if he dies, she will face the endless days of her exile alone, for none of his descendants have stayed with her, choosing to live in the wild places of the world.
Michalko: While in the military I observed that the more an expert one became in an area of military specialization, the less creative and innovative that person became. The paradox is that people who know more, see less; and the people who know less, see more. Consequently, the majority of the generals had a fixed mindset about what is possible and what is not. The creative and innovative solutions to military problem came from the youngest noncoms and officers who still had open minds.
Jacob Weisberg, who writes for Slate magazine, was with me. He’d heard through the incestuous grapevine of journalists and political operatives that I was planning to sneak away for a few hours on election morning and asked if he could come along.
Limitations are not welcome here.
isn’t that exciting of a power. Is this a power you would like to have, if not what kind of supernatural power would you like to have? In all honesty, I have no idea what power I'd like to have. I had to think about this one day on our last read-a-long (i think). I do think it would be awesome to have Evie from Out of This World's powers. I'd love to be able to slow time and rewind and fast forward it. I'd also love to be able to travel to destinations.
The months will pass; there'll be no word.
In such a case, the patent court has a simple job and maintains the patent to the extend to which its validity is undisputed and nullifies the rest - which is not defended anymore. It does so even without substantive examination. So far, this is a fairly boring case.
I'm not sure if she is scared of not making it?
Here's a few shots from last night:
But for now, I think this will be breakfast...
I sat there, a knife in my left jacket pocket, a gun in the other. My inside jacket pocket had long been emptied of any crumbs, and the water bottle I had kept tucked in between my jacket and my shirt was drier than a desert. My pants pockets had some pieces of fabric that I would use to cover my mouth so I wouldn’t breathe in any ash, as well as a couple of safety pins, a matchbook, and an old map that was of no use. The matchbook had only 6 matches left. I tried my best not to use them, and tried to start fires without them, when I could.
This is a picture taken out at my Aunt’s place in Waconia on April 24. It was a bit sunny that day. She keeps some feeders stocked, but these birds REALLY eat alot.
What about those businessmen who cynically exploit Christmas for commercial gain? In this fallen world, there will always be people looking for a way to make a buck. The question is how that energy is channeled. The sort of guy who is looking to make the quick buck could be spending his time in far more destructive activities than trying to dream up the toy that every kid will beg his parents for next Christmas. This is one example of the famous compliment that vice pays to virtue. Because Christmas is about gift-giving, the businessman can't appeal to the consumer's own temptations or selfish desires; he's got to convince him that what he is selling is what someone else might like. In other words, the businessman, in order to make a profit, has got to get the consumer thinking about other people than himself.
In remembrance of
When Irish eyes are smiling
WHAT ABOUT THE FUCKING BILE-BLEEDING BEARS AND THE CANCER CHILDREN?
15. What question have I NOT asked at BTT that you’d love me to ask? (Actually, leave the answer to this one in the comments on this post, huh? So I can find them when I need inspiration!)
Anyway, Allison always tells Simba "ladies first" and then puts the cup closer to Princess. As you can see here, he likes to clean her head while she drinks. What you don't see here is that seconds later, she puts her ears back and starts hissing at him to stop. Sometimes she even raises a paw to him. Seriously. She needs to learn that when a man wants to do something nice for you . . . be thankful!
After a leisurely breakfast we then cruised slowly back through the mountain islands of Ha Long bay, the sights were as beautiful as the day before but the sounds of the birds singing in the trees perched on the cliff reminded me of waking up back home with the morning chorus, very relaxing.
For ages 4-8
It is a very classic blackened cherry red. However, as what is typical about Dior Vernis, there’s always something that sets it apart from other nail polishes. If I look closely at my nail under the light, I see some tiny gold shimmer. You wouldn’t see it from the normal viewing distance, but I think it makes the polish a bit more special. Also, the color is very clean and pure. Even though it has a cream finish, there is nothing “murky” or “heavy” about this color, or any other Dior Vernis I have tried.
Trust me. I’ve brought the topic up about, oh, a million times over the course of the past few months with different groups of women. Generally, this is what I get:
The image is Graphic 45 Le Romantique set and I have added cheesecloth, lace and other small embellishments to finish it off.
Dear Ghaliun and Qdmana,
Me: “Hi Devon.”
It didn't stop there. Moving up in the kitchen, with hours growing longer and contact with the outside world melting away accelerated this disconnect. My patience did a strange dance between short fuse and overwhelming compassion. Calls stopped being returned, emails were never answered. Everything looked different. I felt urgency in my life. Those little moments mattered now. Leaving people behind didn't happen purposely. It was just the way things went down.
I love you…Mercy is yours.
For a long time, I had the idea to start my own business. My biggest fear was simple: financial constraints. I had a mortgage and other obligations which needed immediate attention. How could I start something from scratch with zero income? The financial climate at the time was less than stellar. Friends would ask me, “Now? You’re going to go off on your own now? The market is horrible!” Well, I did it. Someone quite wise once told me that all it takes is planning. You’d surprise yourself with what you could accomplish with proper planning. And he was right. Thanks, Dahlke. While I did get help from various sources, it was up to me to organize and work at creating something from nothing. I created the Burdick Insurance Agency and I could not be happier that I did. What can you create?
The songs were lovely and magical; very Rodgers and Hammerstein. Think “South Pacific” or “Oklahoma.” My favorite song was “Impossible: It’s Possible,” sung by Cinderella and Fairy Godmother. It went like this:
great deals, exclusive resources and new stamping friends
British stag parties must have tired of using the Baltic States as lavabos by now, so drunk-tank tourism is one of the many income funnels that Ukraine may yet drain. Russia misses the boat once again. But then Putin reserves the right to sink it any time he chooses.
5.Coriander Leaves : 2 tbsp chopped
505 D-X/17/1954. “Memorandum With Respect to the Imprisonment of Morton Sobell on Alcatraz.” Prepared for Stephen Love, a Chicago attorney for Mr. Sobell. Chicago, Illinois. See Item C-1990(5), above, pp. 2046-48. See, also, Item B-15 (Projected), above, p. 415 (2004).
Why do men take offence if you turn them down?
“She is crazy,” Moore replied. “I have not smoked meth for four days.”
"The boy and his father went to visit one of the boy's friends on Friday night. The friend, 19, is my daughter's boyfriend and lives across the road from us. My son, 17, and daughter also went to the friend.
Coming home. Living in the most precious place on Earth.
“Girls!” Mr. Z sighed, shook his head, and delivered a blow we never saw coming. “You’ve been digging up the pond lining!”
So how did it rank in the scale of civilian atrocities?
One of my earliest steps toward embracing unschooling was brought about by someone on the old unschooling.com boards asking me if I was sure school would prevent any of the things I was fearful of. The answer, of course, was no. (I should have known this better than anybody, since I'd already had a suicidal six-year-old by the time I asked.)
Bloody Bastard Ale
I think that was the shortest episode of iCarly.
2006: Pujols (2nd)
Let it be known that I am a wimp; I am wet, I am in fact a veritable mollusk on the seabed of life.
Hell, you probably shouldn't have even read my review.
Sourcebooks has graciously offered a giveaway of one copy of The Three Colonels: Jane Austen's Fighting Men by Jack Caldwell.
Wyckoff became a financial journalist with Futures World News for many years, cutting his teeth as a reporter on the futures trading floors in Chicago and New York, where he covered every futures market traded in the United States at one time or another.
A portion of this blog is dedicated to articles which offer varying perspectives about relational and introspective topics. To read, simply click on article titles listed at the bottom center of this page.
Loki, like Prometheus, gives us the gift of illumination. Naturally, other gods were not pleased as certain knowledge was considered to be for the godly alone. Loki, however, had a much better understanding of the people. He had been misled, treated poorly, and mocked by those who would keep knowledge from the masses. We only have to look into the myths to see all demonized to understand their sacrifice.
Fortunately, I do. Ben Stiller and Owen Wilson, Starsky and Hutch, respectively, play off each other well.
Well, it’s been a while since the last update and it’s been a bit insane to say the least.
Missouri Pacific GP35 #660 was built in July 1964 for the Chicago and Eastern Illinois Railway as C&EI #252. Between the time the Locomotive was built and delivered to the time of the filming, the C&EI was split up between the Louisville and Nashville Railroad and the Missouri Pacific, so both railroads could reach Chicago. The unit was built with serial #29543 and Frame #5668-3. The unit was renumbered to MP 2557 during the 1970′s renumbering of Missouri Pacific Locomotives, the unit was given the number 2557. She kept this number for the rest of her life. When the Union Pacific Railroad took over the MoPac in 1982, the locomotive lived on for another 7 months, before retiring in February of 1983. In 1984, the locomotive was sent to EMD as a trade in for new Missouri Pacific SD50′s. She was scrapped by the Pielet Brothers in Chicago later that year.
La Brea villagers are protesting…..Tarouba residents protesting….Mon Desir residents protesting….every week some part of Trinidad protesting and showing their disgust with our Government…and these days the PM mum!!!!! Peas Tin attack she mouth and it swell!
Levy (2006) suggests that when people today expose their iPod screen to an observer, they are turning the otherwise private device into a potential broadcaster of ones taste. And thus it is somewhat possible to judge an individual’s personality by their playlist.
JERICHO TAN
There is another way. Rather than arguing over which economist was wrong (they both were, since you ask), it is time the British people forced their elected representatives into action. Instead of playing by already established economic rules, we should be making our own up.
I really liked both Peyton and Chase (okay, I adored him, but whatever). I may have almost cried at one point towards the end because I just loved them both so much and their relationship had had so many bumps. I was just thinking "When is this going to end?!"
who blushed at her wet shoes. West 72nd Street was a puddle
Program: 8:30 a.m. – 12:00 p.m. 1000 Wellington Avenue Elk Grove Village, IL
They offer the whole range from Belgian specialties to extreme beers from the US West Coast- and they do them all very well.
..but I think he’s coming from the same place.
Won Ton Ton I lie and I cheat B
Can you nominate a point from the lecture that made an impression on you. What did you hear today that helped with your understanding of modernism?
Here's a fun fact you may not know about your favorite psychologically-damaged housewife: I have a REAL problem with authority.
Adviser: Yes.
HoneyDew gets quite peppy in the fall, running, sniffing, she has lots of energy after being sluggish from the summer heat. She can walk for hours going in one direction. If we turn around to retrace our steps, she becomes quite obstinate, passive aggressive even! Can you imagine pushing, prodding, carrying a basset that weighs 64 pounds when she decides she does not want to move?
I finally got rid of it yesterday after I took a pain pill, and had a nap. (Zen fired ze missiles!)
9:45am update: Today is Allen's one day off for the week. He's trying to stay out of the butchering . . . so instead, he and Gus are making up some bookshelves! We had the lumber already sanded, just needs to be cut, nailed together, stained, and sealed. We need these bookcases to use them as a "wall" between Gus and Josiah, when they share Gus' room, so they can each have some privacy, and a place to put things (um, like clothing, for instance).
A&E has partnered with several leading federal agencies and non-profit organizations to develop The Recovery Project, including the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA); NCADD; Faces & Voices of Recovery and the Partnership for a Drug-Free America (PDFA).
To fill everyone in on what's been going on with the Cannon's lately, here's a little run-down:
Each template can be used to design reversible and regular appliqué patterns as well. There are no limits, and no restrictions on how these templates can be used in quilting, design and marking.
the same thing every single day. Picture #1: 1 cup of blueberry yogurt,
Thought you might like a close-up of my note from Merryn...
And that's it. I have NO IDEA where it goes from there...LOL!
I kiss shiny objects much less frequently than I once did. I do have the occasional run in with the rings of royalty. Otherwise the kettle is the only inanimate object of my desire, and the housemate suggests that kissing it is insanitary.
For a long time, the term British Heavyweight meant an also ran. Frank Bruno and Lennox Lewis finally put an end to that malaise and brought some credibility back to the British Heavyweight boxing scene. All that went out of the window last night as Derek Chisora tried to out thug David Haye and got a bottle in his face for his troubles.
Slight tenderness, instablity in knee and needed walking aid.
Anyway. Now I had my phone back, but we were still going to have to set up the dryer at some point.
The good news is Jesus has been working on me and while I still have that wall, it’s more of a boundary than an insurmountable obstacle! Over the years I have slowly handed my bricks to Him. Each one has been an extremely freeing experience. (Amazing the amount of effort it takes to keep a brick wall up!) And, He has shown me that it is OK to show people the squishy inside.
“You were like a sweaty octopus trying to unhook a bra! It was like watching John Leslie at work…”
If we want to get metaphysical about it, I could be wondering, is there some sort of chink in reality; some sort of crevice in the fabric of the world, with all the happy hookers over on one side and all the broken, shattered ones on the other.
“Watched 7 Khoon maaf,las night Well directed@priyankachopra rockd,really complex role but u did a gr8 job effortlessly,U go girl,all d best (sic),” Shilpa posted on her Twitter page.
congratulation, my friend....here you can see her amazing work with odd
The aliens seemed unsure as to what to do next until the SWAT and police began to open fire on them. Each alien carried what looked to be a cannon connected by some sort of cables to a large backpack they carried. Human small arms bullets ricocheted off grey body armor they were wearing. A high-pitched whine began to be heard emanating from the cannons and when the sound peaked, the two began blazing away literally blowing everything they hit into tiny pieces. They even swept the building my little group was hiding behind and within seconds, it was reduced to rumble. Only a five-foot length of the back wall remained for us to hide behind.
I have also been out all afternoon at meetings relating to my children, in particularly Joshua – hopefully his statement of educational need will be changed soon so that I can look for a more appropriate school for his needs.
The best way of promoting my books is through author talks in schools. Unfortunately, I am only allowed out of the asylum on a Wednesday afternoon which limits the events I can complete. I also do signings on Saturdays at bookstores. This can be quite lucrative as I can sell around 70 books in four hours. For an unknown, that’s not bad. And, if I am in a town where a store has my book stocked, I will also hang around and wait for an unsuspecting victim, usually selling to them after a quick chat. Many people are delighted to see a real life author – even if she is self-published. All my books are on websites such as, Amazon, Waterstones, W H Smith etc. Did I mention that my first book is available as a Kindle e-book …
In that moment, I realized something... Normally, when you have a negative pregnancy symptom, a part of you tries to explain it away because you get the prize at the end: a beautiful, precious, baby. Then I realized... I don't have that... This was the first time I noticed that I didn't have anything to help talk myself out of those hard pregnancy symptoms.
Manicure Description: I used Milani Flamboyant In Green as the base with a coat of Northern Lights holographic topcoat on my thumb because the stamps are never wide enough for my thumbs. I used Konad white stamping polish and the Bundle Monster stamp BM-224 on the other fingers. Then I just stuck on some random gemstones for some more accents.
Do you know anybody having a baby? This would be a super cute gift, especially if you wrapped it with diapers, cream and wipes. Or better yet, make one for yourself like I did!
soul mates
I wish that I could fly.
(Note: My sister Laura told us not to put this directly on cement or concrete, but up on wood. So I bought a 2x4, had it cut into thirds at Home Depot, and we put our barrel on top of the wood on the side of our house...and then filled it with the hose. We did not treat the water with bleach because it's clean enough coming from the hose already. And this isn't water for drinking. We have bulk water bottles for that.)
* Hid trash cans.
Details: 105 pages – 5/12/10 (This is an early draft of the script. The situations, characters, and plot may change significantly by the time the film is released. This is not a definitive statement about the project, but rather an analysis of this unique draft as it pertains to the craft of screenwriting).
A friend of mine shared with me what they had learned from their recently passed uncle – How to love: up to the ceiling, down to the floor, the whole world round, and a lot, lot more. These are words to live by and I hope that I come across that way to the world, because a good part of the time, I feel it. I am it.
Frank Pervan / To Ron Riddell / 59
Therefore Adoni-Zedek king of Jerusalem sent to Hoham king of Hebron, Piram king of Jarmuth, Japhia king of Lachish, and Debir king of Eglon, saying, “Come up to me and help me, that we may attack Gibeon, for it has made peace with Joshua and with the children of Israel.”
I want, more than anything, for these kids to grow up not frightened of Billy or anyone different to them.
And He (Allah swt) encouraged the Mujahidin in His Cause to take a firm stand without any(kind)of fear and to display true bravery (against the enemy) from the start of the battle to the end- as He said:
While President Obama certainly has an above-average sense of humor for a politician — easy-going, self-effacing, maybe a little corny at times — he’s not known as one of the planet’s foremost comedians.
Potatoes - 1/2 kg
But as the glowing reviews and calls of congrats roll in the following day, the joy is drained from Clara's sense of accomplishment by the discovery of a body with a broken neck lying among the flowers in her garden. The Surete de Quebec takes up residence in Three Pines to begin the investigation and, in the process, readers are treated to a fascinating look inside the competitive, nasty, world of artists and galleries.
One of my favorite shows, The Office (U.K.), illustrates some of the, um, worst practices for public speaking. David Brent is the "entertaining" boss with a "cool vibe," who, sadly, doesn't really know a ton about effective presenting. Fortunately, I do, and I'll share some tips with you.
Giriaff is from Create a Criter cut at 5.50"
The chippy white table in the corner holds a pair of antique crocks with pale grey glaze and a crinkled wire antique basket the I picked up recently here in Nebraska. It's one of the things I bought to sell in my Etsy shop, but I don't see it happening anytime soon. Sorry...
Just as in Stalin's Russia (the regime Orwell was condeming) people were punished who didn't obey the state's latest ideological diktats, so too is Mrs Featherstone's Britain moving towards punishing people who won't accept the homosexual rights agenda.
We've bypassed the troubles of the last attempt at the big PG by a bunch of antibiotics when the grand event occurred, lots of prayer-wheel spinning and holding of breath. Now she's just like a pregnant woman in her third trimester:* she's bloated, irritable, and eats anything and everything that gets within a few feet of her long and very agile nose.
So, tell me, what are some of your favorite books from childhood? Do you have books still in your possession that bear the inscription of a loved one? Can you still remember the phone number and address at your childhood home? I'm interested in going down memory lane with all of you, so please feel free to share with me.
What’s in the Box
Wow. The past couple weeks or so have been quite eventful. I’ll do my best to provide an abridged version/summary, plus maybe a thought or two.
“I don’t wanna be still. Put me down.”
5. In 400 words, create your ideal place.
From the App Store:
A few scenes in Zombie Vs. Ninja even run in fast-forward, presumably for humor purposes, often accompanied by goofy sound effects. I guess Ho and his producer Jospeh Lai (who was also something of an auteur, having produced over 90 films himself) realized that something so outlandish and goofy should not be taken seriously, even in the sense of creating a movie that looks or sounds like something that could conceivably stand alongside Enter The Dragon. What we have here is a movie that is too cartoony for its own good. And while that may work for the non-discriminating viewer who just wants to look at something onscreen to pass 90 minutes or so, for someone wanting to find quality fight scenes and intriguing dialogue this would have the effect of expecting an ice cream cone and instead getting a fudgesicle... only I don't think that's fudge on that stick, there....
And, in case you were wondering about general process stuff, and where things fit in a year-and-ten-month process like mine, they chose a cover artist! I'm not going to tell you who it is, because things can always go wrong, and there's always a small possibility that they'll have to change artists part way in. But I will say that all the members of the cover team, as well as marketing and sales, all were unanimous in their choice. (Which almost never happens.) You know, not having control over your cover is a scary thing. When my editor sent me his name and links, I can't tell you how relieved I was! I screamed, cried tears of joy and relief, and danced all at the same time. I have no doubt that whatever he does will be genius.
2. Sewing! I've been sewing like crazy, making mei tais, cloth diapers, and tried my first pair of fleece longies. I have a folder on my FB of my recent projects if your interested or bored lol http://www.facebook.com/#!/album.php?aid=2055623&id=1165500151
He wrote a poem about me and I'll have to track that down.
I’m not egotistical.
I wasn’t happy I wasn’t sad
When did you start scrapbooking/paper crafting and why?
2.) Before Vivien Leigh was signed, Paulette was the leading contender in the race to play Scarlett O’Hara in Gone With The Wind (1939). Other top candidates who were considered were Joan Bennett and Jean Arthur but Paulette was at the top of the heap. Her inability to produce a marriage certificate proving her domestic status with then husband (?) Charlie Chaplin, along with the entrance of Miss Leigh into the “Scarlett” pool, was enough to dismiss any hopes of securing the role. The strength of her screen test, along with all the publicity the part generated for her, did however help her snag a long term contract with Paramount Pictures. (The clip above shows several screen and make-up tests for Paulette and others. The portion dealing with Goddard begins at about three minutes in.)
Welcome Svigor. The anti-anti-semites I’ve “debated” are otherwise rationale people with an encyclopaedic knowledge of jew-Gentile conflict, yet they tend to apportion collective blame to disparate Gentile cultures sprinkled across time and space (e.g., presuming an unjust pogrom or Holocaust can spring from Whites anywhere) even while they judge any criticizing or apportioning of blame to jews collectively as ironclad evidence of the accuser’s subhumaness.
Cheese (Keffalo-Gravyera)
Real life result: I can no longer eat chicken that has been processed through a meat works.
I love dreaming.
never change. This is the reason you must let His Word abide in you richly.
OUT OF PAPER. RECEIPT AVAILABLE AT THE CHECKOUT COUNTER
"Pretending to be Girl Scouts, we hiked to Clay Mountains. Lost, exhausted and thirsty, we finally made our way home after ten hours. We were so excited to see the outline of our camp against the sunset sky. No one had missed us, since it was still light outside at 7pm."
I've been soooo busy trying to wrap
As many of you may know, I've been in the midst of switching over from the bar/restaurant industry into the beauty/skin care industry. I received my esthetician license last year and have been working full-time as a Beauty Advisor ever since while still managing to bartender a few nights a week. I'm tired. I'm cranky. My heart is no longer into crafting cocktails for a thirsty public well into the wee hours of the night, especially since now I have to get up at 4 am for my day job. Getting up early really takes the magic out of everything.
and mix well until dough forms, add some milk if needed. Place 1/2 of
Genre Appeal: (7/10) – As an action movie, Wrath is decent. The action scenes are reasonably fun to watch, the sense of powerful stuntwork is there, and I’d be lying if I said that the movie wasn’t thrilling in its own small, but noteworthy way, especially since the 3D effectively adds to the movie’s sense of power and atmosphere. As a fantasy movie though, Wrath feels a bit too gritty and grounded, despite the appearance of Greek mythology beasts and titans trying desperately to claim otherwise. It’s not quite so down-to-earth as Immortals was, but Wrath lacks a sense of wonder and enchantment, even as a Greek mythology movie, making it seem kind of weak as a fantasy film. If you’re going for the thrills and spills, Wrath is good enough to check out if you’re laid-back and easygoing with your action fix, but if you want a really strong, memorable fantasy blockbuster, you might want to keep waiting for the Summer offerings that are right around the corner.
I stuck my head out of the hotel room window and spotted the snowcapped volcano to my left. I stepped out and headed in that direction.
The subsequent films in the series were not quite so complex in their social commentary. Each generally dwelt only on one big theme that was introduced in POTA, so i am going to save further analysis for the appropriate film. Tomorrow, I will talk about my favorite of the series, Beneath the Planet of the Apes with its cynical view of religion and the value of humanity.
* The kids started swim lessons this week and did GREAT!! Sarah and Jacob even got bumped up to the next level before the class even started since their instructor remembered how close they were to passing Level 1 last summer. Adam is in the PreK class and after some minor hesitation, got in by himself and did great! Woo hoo!
Good luck to the contestants! I'm sure you're gonna love these :)
My shoots are up.
While the boys went camping, Kenzie, Kayley, and I went to the park for dinner and water balloon games with a group of moms and daughters from the ward. We had a lot of fun, until Kayley had a water balloon pop on her shirt and she started to get cold.
Monday, site 2 is removed. Right below my collar-bone. Shark bite take 2! I wonder how enormous the bandage will be this time?? Hopefully people will take pity on my Tuesday at work and bring me cookies (Jen, I’ll be in Winter Park that day, ok??).
Another thing I love to do is join in different swapping groups! Here's one of the quilts that I made for a doll quilt swap. The pattern is called Shoo Fly and I really like it because it introduced me to an improv style of piecing. I didn't have to measure out each corner triangle... you just stitch it on and see what happens. I like it because there is still some distinct pattern and order to the quilt, but it has some movement with the varying sizes of the corner triangle pieces.
This year I will celebrate quietly. I will celebrate:
Three of the five publishers named in the lawsuit--HarperCollins, Hachette, and Simon and Schuster--have agreed to settle. Among other things, the settlement prohibits them from setting consumer prices for the next two years, prevents them from entering into retailer agreements that include Most Favored Nation clauses (i.e., no one can undersell the retailer) for the next five years, and requires them to terminate their contracts with Apple within seven days of signing the settlement. They must also engage in a variety of compliance activities, including appointing an Anti-Trust Compliance Officer. (Helpful overviews of the settlement terms can be found at ShelfAwareness, Wired, and Publishers Weekly.)
The journey home was a bad one, the Cape Horn storms repeatedly drove them back, he described four months of gales, the ship beating into the wind but unable to round Cape Horn, four months in wet clothes, wet living quarters, rotten food, picking insects out of the biscuits they were fed, four months of shipmates lost swept overboard, of men falling from the rigging, men crushed by shifting cargo.
I wanted to write a short note to all of you saying how much I have enjoyed and been inspired by BASNCR over the past four+ years. I was astonished to find such a wonderful and thriving botanical group when my husband and I returned from our last overseas post in 2007; it’s been a pleasure knowing and working with all of you.
The title promises a lot, and maybe also too much. Please forgive me for that, but I simply couldn’t make a better title up.
I'll make you coffee or tea,
Hundreds of forms were sent to the FBI, Postal Inspector, and Attorney General's office during this investigation from authors who had hundreds to thousands of dollars disappear with no services. The fraudulence of Airleaf went way beyond book publishing; blatant scams included promises to sell books in Europe on trips that were never taken; selling a cruise to authors that was never booked nor the money returned; selling magazine reviews that were never sent to the magazines; promising to make movies out of books but never turning them into films; and continuing to collect royalties (though not pay them to authors) from Internet distributors such as Amazon and Barnes & Noble long after Airleaf was shut down. This is just a small sample of Airleaf's efforts to steal money from authors. Your readers can read the list of charges, and some of the stories of our victims, at my website at www.AirleafVictims.com.
Creek: For approximately the first half-mile, the trail follows Reedy Fork closely through a broad bottomland, filled with towering hardwoods. The creek, which is 15- to 20-feet in width, is one of the most substantial creeks in the Greensboro area.
The hurt you brought
Laura Bartlett Gallery (here): Cyprien Gaillard (5), John Divola (3), Becky Beasley (1 set of 3). I liked the changing definition of space in this hybrid of sculpture and photography by Beasley. It was priced at £11500.
It happened last Sunday, April 29. My aunt woke me up to inform me that Katie’s blood is everywhere outside our house – in the garage, below the stairs leading to the terrace, and in the backyard. She also mistakenly told me that she is already dead. I went outside and saw red stains all over, as if someone’s been stabbed. Later, the husband of my cousin told me that our cat is in the backyard and is still alive. I went to see Katie and what I saw broke my heart.
The one who does get very involved in my boys gaming, even though I was so far from a gamer before he introduced me to it.
8. Twenty-five (25) years ago, the Philippines had some sixteen (16) million hectares of rainforests constituting roughly 53% of the country’s land mass.
The director M. Night Shyamalan said that this movie is his “Bedtime Story for grown-ups.” It is a bedtime story, the fairy-tale of humanity that most grown-ups go to bed longing to believe. And it is wonderful. Half an hour in, I started to cry and I couldn’t stop. It was not a violent kind of weeping, but my eyes simply overflowed.
Authentic Cuba Tours runs a bird-watching tour starting at US$1,949.
This, incidentally, is the meaning of the scriptural phrase “faith like a mustard seed.” The mustard seed is a tiny seed, but the plant that grows from it is quite large. And so mustard seed faith does not describe small faith in the sense of quality, it is that all faith, by the nature of faith, grows through repeated acts of small obedience. To plant a mustard seed is to perform a very small task. But planting it is an act of obedience: you are trusting in the nature of the seed. When you perform small acts of trust, God is able to work in your life. And so faithfulness, great faithfulness, as we see it in others, is always an accumulation of small faith-deeds. It is a lifestyle that reaps steady and gradual rewards. I say to you that there is no such thing as big faith and little faith—as if some people have great faith while others have small faith. All faith is small. It only appears big because it is accumulated.
In the part on “planting polycultures” they point out by interspersing flowering annuals or perennials with your vegetables you help to attract the beneficial insects while confusing the pests (it’s harder to zero in on the scent of the tomato plant when there are other plants disguising them). They suggest marigolds as being particularly helpful, and not just to keep away slugs. I don’t know if I can go that far (marigolds!?) but I can see some bright cheerful nasturtiums winding through my tomatoes. Heck they’re edible too!
Well right now I live in Germany before that was Texas before that I did a stint in salt lake city and soon we are going back to a new part of texas. My husband was either in these far away lands with me or in Iraq or Afghanistan and we wanted to be able to let our families know that we are alive and kicking
The best bit about this process is that we have got a whole load of this "money" and we throw it from the car on the way to the temple----of course we will get arrested for littering.
daughter says that the dad is a little scared and the mom just doesn’t
Happy grazing!
The story is here:
You don't need to be more or less religious than you are right now.
to be a mama.
I wonder, when it is all boiled down whether or not it really is the Lord’s battles that we often are engaged in, or simply our own. I look at some of the “friendly fire” which happens due to differences among Christians. And after all, the battle is hot. And we won’t see eye to eye on everything in this life. And at times we need correction, and sometimes a call to repent of wrong in doctrine or life.
D: TLDR skimmed through lets see. J went and found quotes from the bible about the subject at hand and made evidence for his point as did I. The only evidence you brought forward is a slight comment to evolution. If I were pre reading an english essay based on what has been posted on here J would already be far ahead of you because all of yours is based on opinion and does not have any evidence backing it up.
Writer- Stephen Susco (screenplay)
This basically shows that my levels are well above the max average for a singleton...but I think it could still go either way. I've heard from several ladies who had similar numbers and only had one in there...so, we'll see! So frickin' excited AND nervous about what happened last time. However, we are feeling much better about this pregnancy!
You have created me with the capacity for deep affections — to love, to loathe, to desire, to delight, to excite, to grieve, to laugh, to enjoy, to fear, to be depressed, to be thankful. And you made me this way that I may glorify you by finding you my Supreme Satisfaction and the Fountain of everything delightful.
So when the new release of March stamps arrived at my home I instantly knew what to make with the cute Spring has Sprung stamps.
Were you wondering if you are doing the will of God? Here is a practical guide to figuring it out. And if you thought this was awesome, wait till tomorrow! Talk about exciting stuff. The Word of God never gets old, it never grows pale over time. These truths are more applicable today than EVER before!
It just makes me smile.
It's like my little friend, the scale... he's a brutally honest guy, but we tend to ignore his signs... 230... 240... 250... OMG... WT#... GET... OFF... NOW! It's like money and budgeting decisions. Most folks are very careful when buying a house, a car, a boat... we'll haggle with the car dealer over $200, yet many of us waste that much every month on little items that have no collective importance other than momentary satisfaction a second after we observed them in the check-out aisle.
"I have your 'buddy', and the dorm is 'hand held', you have to take my hand" she told me.
back to our own.
So, given, that you’re not entirely averse to full-mortals, who, looking around you in the modern world, might take your fancy? (I do notice that from time to time you bat your eyelashes at Lucy Coats…) What characteristics make up your ideal lover, Seth? (Girls, will you please stop panting, you’re steaming up your screens.)
Took us a while to get moving this morning but we headed into town to have a look around. Headed straight towards the esplanade and the coast. Our first glimpse of the Arafura Sea (well, my first glimpse! Tim has been here before) was a beautiful blue-green bay. No surf up here, the ocean is all calm. Another hot and muggy day. Even though it is only about 34' it is all clammy and we were shiny and sweaty within minutes. There is a big park that runs the length of the foreshore area and we walked along that and into town. The town centre has a nice feel to it. It's kinda cool to be in a capital city where most everything is closed on a Sunday! LOL! The cafes and stuff were open but all the general businesses and shops were shut. We wandered around for a bit and then decided to grab some lunch. We had walked past a pretty authentic looking chinese restaurant a few times that smelt great and they had a Sunday Yum Cha special so we decided to head in for that. I have to admit i had no clue what i was grabbing from the chef... little spiky balls of meaty rice and some kind of white speckled folded up pancake thing. It was all ok but with no menu and no prices it ended up a scary $39 for a not so big lunch. Ouch!
Separate the eggs, placing yolks in a small bowl and whites in a clean, medium bowl. Beat egg yolks; then fold yolks, kale, chives, salt and pepper into potatoes. Use clean electric beaters or a large whisk to whip egg whites until firm, but not stiff. Fold a quarter of them into potato mixture, then gently fold in the rest.
Ruby-$599
The picture by the late British artist Robert Lenkiewicz depicts bestiality with a goat. Apparently, guests we’re put off their tea or were disgusted upon their check-in to the hotel. So much so, that the Ritz has had to demand that the gallery take it off display. The gallery first argued that it had been put on a revolving platform so there were going to be times where it was not shown to the public. But after parents had companied that their children had been exposed to inappropriate material the gallery decided to take it down. One gallery worker said: ‘It’s interesting watching peoples’ reactions as they walk past. Many can’t believe what they have just seen. He is still creating controversy, even in death.’
Following the title game plan of just one syllable – Statham’s new vehicle called Safe opened yesterday. The word safe has many meanings:
When it hurts a little bit, I can't stand at my work table to do anything. When it hurts moderately, I can't sit up straight at my sewing machine. When it hurts a lot I have to take major pain killers and then I can't think or stay awake.
Last week in Jacksonville, I woke up at the beach to the sound of birds chirping, waves crashing and the peaceful bliss of a sunshiny day. I shuffled into the kitchen to brew a fresh pot of coffee. While admiring my collection of newly gathered seashells my eyes wandered to the carton of Land O Lakes Fat Free Half & Half – “Our half & half contains no preservatives or artificial flavors.” Awe, how nice, I thought.
(Yeah. I had to look it up, too. Thank you, DinosaurTrain.)
“Tell me!” he demanded.
As the name suggests, this sub-part of the leftist newspaper Libération is focused on all things screen related: internet, video games, TV, movies...
1 manually
My Take: I was very intrigued by the whole premise of this book. Imagine losing your memory and not being able to feel anything? The show Haven has a character that can't feel any pain. Anyway back to the book. This book explores the way the current culture seems to latch onto almost anything for entertainment(reality shows, paparazzi etc). I am just as guilty of this as anyone as I absolutely love Survivor. Those who are invovled in the entertainment need to be very careful. This book also explores the other end , where people use the entertainer to further them instead of the entertainer's best interest.
Although this is a young girl we can liken many people’s confusion about whether this instance is child sexual abuse to Eddie Long. In his situation, there were young boys who he brought gifts. He was trusted and even loved by the parents of these children.
1 1/2 pounds chicken breasts (about 3 large chicken breasts)
That's my husband in the red union suit and I am just to his right in the black nightie - (mmm..hmmmm....maybe in my next life)
Note: Tim Burton is working on a Dark Shadows film this very minute, with Johnny Depp as Barnabas. I really don’t want to see a campy, Cirque De Soliel trannyfest that Burton might make of it, and I am tired as hell of Johnny Depp. The one saving grace is apparently Depp has been a fan of the show since childhood, so hopefully that will add something special to his portrayal of the iconic vampire.
Me: Bubbs, I have to admit something.
Fairy tales again! This time Rapunzel, hopefully that came out obvious enough. Often times I’m drawing something and even though it looks dead right to me, it can take other people a lot longer to figure it out.
An amazingly concentrated wine, this is unlike any other Tempranillo I have ever tasted – 92/100 points.
“Anybody who really cared about the details — which, admit it, is virtually no one – could then check out the whole decision online,” Stern said. “But the Jumbotron would catch the essential up-and-down or side-to-side head movement. Any judgments or dissents that accompany the nodding could be captured by fellow audience members, who would meet with the media afterwards.”
Did you know there’s an entrepreneur anointing? No?
When figures such as Richard Dawkins are asked to defend themselves against religion, they always select as their opponents the most extreme fundamentalists — whether Christian, Muslim or Jewish.
Then once the cakes were baked and cooled, I again used the mold to cut Hello Kitty out of the cake. I ended up using only one of the cakes, cut in half horizontally to make two layers, since both of the cakes together plus the filling would be taller than the mold itself.
Being confident doesn’t necessarily mean that you have it under control and you know you own the shit, it´s basically about exerting yourself for who you are. With your little imperfections. I mean, we cannot all look the same right? that would be some wired shit. So girl, before you go on and talk about how you wish your nose was smaller, how you wish your cheekbones were higher etc. Remember every girl, even the ones you think look perfect have their own issues. And the cure to that is to rock what you have.
We also know that she may not respond with the grateful heart that we all hope our kids will when we sacrifice for them. Deep down we all want to be thanked and recognized for our love, our obedience and our hard work. We want to see fruits of our sacrifice, lights at the end of the tunnel and happy endings.
We can judge ourselves by what others say and think, we can judge ourselves by what society calls beautiful.....the only way to to win this race....really is self-love and acceptance. Self-loathing,
Turn the dough out onto a work surface, gather it together and divide it in half. Working with one half at a time, shape the dough into logs that are 1 1/2 inches in diameter. Wrap the logs in plastic wrap and refrigerate them for at least 3 hours. (The dough can be refrigerated for up to 3 days or frozen for up to 2 months. If you’ve frozen the dough, you needn’t defrost it before baking — just slice the logs into cookies and bake the cookies 1 minute longer.)
I will post as soon as I can and go into detail of each as mentioned above as soon as I get two minutes.
Little Bird, Night Owl is my new project. I start new projects once in a while to keep me creative and to explore new ways to express myself and help others. Welcome!
4. 19-20-20
On the next page, awww it’s a lovely picture of a porcelain dog! Apparently, the dog was engraved especially for Princess Diana’s birthday, and can be mine for nothing apart from 24 monthly payments of £17.99, plus postage, plus labour, plus tax, plus dog handling charges, plus sky plus subscription. Where’s the scissors? I need to cut this bad boy out right now!
DW: Well, that’s not only treasonous, it sounds crazy.
A small shed at the Hafnarfjördur Museum now has a special display dedicated to Hafnarfjördur’s elves and hidden people. Also, local clairvoyant Erla Stefánsdóttir has prepared a map of the Hidden World as revealed to her by these unique residents. It is available from the Tourist Information Centre for anyone willing to venture a visit to those otherworldly lands.
Mr Miller’s plan is clearly consistent with (b).
Delta, I don’t often fly your airline because y’all just don’t fly to where I go without stops. That said, I get excited when your prices and my destinations do align because it means one thing: Biscoff cookies. Yum. The first time I had the pleasure of eating one of these heaven-sent cookies was on a flight to Atlanta 4 years ago. I didn’t think they were even worth taking until my travel companion got really excited. So I broke into my little pack of 2 cookies and let me just say that it’s a good thing the captain had instructed us to keep our seatbelts fastened or else I would’ve fallen onto the floor out of sheer delight. Oh. My. Word! That was the day Delta and Biscoff blurred into one being and I fell in love with a crunchy little spice cookie.
I recently watched this story from ABC News and loved it. A banker stood all day beneath a balcony trying to talk down some baby ducklings who were stuck. What a guy.
The level of intentionality of the human being depends on the relationship between the individual with others and the contact with other’s desires and emotions. Without reciprocity of Intentionality there is no room for personal growth, or the study of the emotions and sensations. Without these elements, the existence of intentionality is impossible.
We are in the social media century. It is likely that some social media application has significantly impacted your life. Facebook has over 500 million active users, with average usage at 47 minutes each day (Facebook, February 2011). YouTube has resulted in a new phrase added to our daily vocabulary–going viral. A social media app or application has made it big when it becomes a verb: friended, tweeted, skyped, texted, blogged.
Also if you would like to participate in making your home a haven I've put the schedule below. Each week we tackle one specific task.
Polly Jean
Parker started with a cold last week, the bug found me Thursday and today Riley & Prince Charming are the newest victims. Thankfully it is just an "annoying" bug rather than an "I'm going to lay you flat on your butt" kinda bug. We all have the sniffles and a little sore throat but other than that we are fine.
Earrings are very hour Frequently as a process, a bouquet of flowers both typical and h frequently also vanish at last Be. A question that you give parents that she PERFORMING for a long time and also not to forget the woman’s son or daughter, what the people who sent him to help his people, as a Hermes handbag, that Victoria is a treasure. An individual type of gift that anyone has to offer on this special occasion, or even special Mothering Sunday and / or M marriage Girl is actually a pocket. S well R, a good case can appear as well H too Frequently, but due to the current expansion in the concept image, k You can pictures of almost all kinds of things to use. In those days, Hermes handbags constant, k You can copy all the pix you au To go OUTSIDE of your pocket. This bag is specifically your camera bag. By using this type of option, you have the M Opportunity, change the product to your bag of mother.
I've never personally met you so I need to ask if it's okay to call you Scott. I'm assuming so since you took a call from a prankster whom you thought was a buddy of yours named David Koch. Is it okay for an actual constituent of yours to be on a first name basis with you?
. Currently the software and drivers available for the following operating systems: Windows XP
Unfortunately you had to experience your very first ear infection :( 2 days before we left for the beach you had a little bit of a runny nose and "goopy" eyes as they call it, so as a "just in case" I made you a doctors appointment. (Landon had been sick the week before, so I honestly thought you might have caught his cold). You didn't have his cold, but you did have your very first ear infection. Luckily the doc said that on a scale of 1-10, yours was only about a 4 and that with antibiotics it would clear up fast and you'd feel no pain. Whew! Thank goodness!
- However, there are downsides. Well, I should call them concerns, because they haven’t been proven yet. For one, it’s durability. With a biodegradable major component, you’d likely to worry about the lifespan of the product. Secondly, the mesh upper makes them ideal running shoes for summer, but how about winter? And finally, this may not be universally applicable, but my right toes are a bit longer than my left toes, and therefore after a 6k run the other day, I had started to develop blisters on my right, which was fine, but I just wished the toe box, just generally, would be a teeny bit bigger.
The warning signs were there a while back. Self-publishers are a marmite-y kind of bunch. Half of us are belligerent “dead tree books are screwed and legacy publishing’s dead” types. The other half are desperate to show we’re just as good as regular-published books (and half of those say it because they want a regular contract, whilst the other half want to control the process but compete for the same market).
Background. In April 2011, Apple filed suit against Samsung alleging three basic infringement claims: (1) Samsung infringed Apple’s U.S. Design Patents D618,677 and D593,087 by selling its Galaxy S 4G and Infuse 4G smart phones, (2) Samsung infringed U.S. Design Patent No. D504,889 by selling its Galaxy Tab 10.1 tablet computer, and (3) Samsung infringed U.S. Patent No. 7,469,381, entitled “List scrolling and document translation, scaling and rotation on a touch-screen display,” by selling all three devices and the Samsung 4G LTE smart phone. Apple moved for a preliminary injunction to bar the four accused Samsung products from the U.S. market pending a full trial on the merits (perhaps not coincidentally, during the holiday shopping season).
Also, two more quick pieces of news:
Enter Muhammad El Baradei. The former head of the International Atomic Energy Agency returned to his native Egypt as a reformer and presidential hopeful. He founded the National Association for Change movement. Among the organization's chief activities was a petition drive seeking seven reforms that would change three articles of the constitution, for a more democratic and open political system.
Trying to think back to how my mindset was at sixteen and comparing it to this book, I would walk away with one conclusion... having sex is not a big deal if you don't have feelings for the person. Call me crazy, but as a teen that would have stuck out for me at the time and probably encouraged me to do it to "get the virginity issue out of the way." Maybe that was just the way my mind worked and others wouldn't see it that way, but it seemed to be the message being promoted. While the author tried to redeem the story at the end with the "love" theme trumping everything else, it fell a bit flat for me. Last, after all of that waiting for her to realize who she really loved, I would have liked to see Shelby and Jonas kiss at least once. That was a bit of a letdown. I didn't feel encouraged at the end of the book because the character's arc wasn't strong enough to make me satisfied at the end.
Because I have one. And you might, too. Ain't no shame - if you have a muffin top and you are working out, you are working on it! That said, feeling a bit drafty because you suddenly feel your midriff exposed while trying to exercise can be at best distracting, at worst, fairly mortifying. It helps to know that you can work on the muffin top while keeping it in its place - which is to say, away from the cruel light of day, or overhead fluorescent lights at 5 a.m. workouts.
For Tamils, life has not returned to normal in Sri Lanka, especially in the still heavily militarised north. About 72,000 Tamil refugees remain in camps funded and run by the Indian government in the southern state of Tamil Nadu. In comparison to the brutal days of Sri Lanka’s civil war, life is good in the camps. Residents have access to education and health services identical to their Indian neighbours outside the wire. But there are few prospects, and fewer ways out. The refugees scrap for the lowest-paying, most dangerous jobs, those that locals won’t take. Men paint high-rise buildings as itinerant workers in distant cities. They can never become Indian citizens, and their adopted country is not a signatory to the UN Convention on Refugees so they have few legal protections.
The Field: Looping State of Mind - surprisingly stirring for electronic music.
Okay, I've been talking about it a lot. The reason is that I totally found my creative energy while we were in Maine and there was so much inspiration!
P.S.S. Can it get any crazier than that?
My father was an incredibly hard-working man. For most of my life he was a police officer. He started as a patrolman and retired as the chief.
In the five years I've been planning kid parties, this was the EASIEST and MOST FUN we've had yet... and I even made the cake! I even had party guests comment about how fun it was and they were REALLY interested in having parties just like ours.
This week has been very fulfilling. The kids and I accomplished a lot and had some fun while we were at it! I am linking with Sue over at The Homeschool Chick for the weekly Homeschool Mother's Journal Post. If you haven't already, hop on over to participate.
Me to Ryan: I LOVE YOUR TATTOO!
Red-tailed Hawk 1
"I've had offers, but I've been too busy. I do love the
It turns out the those four moons have very peculiar features, not so alien to our own mundane ones. For example, with more than 400 active volcanoes, Io is the most geologically active object in the solar system. Europa is covered with a solid, icy crust above a liquid ocean water. The only way to find out if this is really the case is to get up, close and personal with Europa and confirm the presence of water underneath its ice sheath. And if water is indeed on Europa then there is a good chance that its harbouring life. Be it viral or bacterial or amoeboid, it will be life. And because it would have been found on Europa then wouldn’t it be fitting to call those inhabitants, albeit simple and microscopic, Europeans?
Films – 2 (83)
I sat at the bar, alone, waiting for my friends to arrive when she sat down next to me and proceeded to ruin my night. I wasn't looking for anything from anyone at that point as me pals had yet to arrive but she was. She was looking hard for trouble or fucking or some wretchedly stupid and drunk combination of the two. Fuck me, can't a guy get a goddamn drink in peace?
"A Dressing Room"
The paper, the pen, the mind of the reader, and the heart of those touched by the words
Send the notecard to Dani Plassitz between May1-12, 2011 and make sure she confirms that she got it.
Each person has a predominate language in which he or she gives and receives love. The languages are:
In the spring, surprisingly, I got a new letter from Linky. A talented sculptress—whose work I may have biasedly found superb—she was headed for Italy for further study with the famed sculptor Arturo Martini. On the way, she intended to stop in Paris for some time with me, and I was to meet her at the appointed time at the city’s airplane bus terminal.
I used Flower Shoppe and Forever young for the flowers, you can use any flowers from any cart. I created the card with Cricut Craft Room Basics cartridge. Here is the cut file.
That I am a Salt groupie and therefore hopelessly prejudiced in their favour is a well-established fact. But you don’t have to be a fan to discern that Salt make beautiful, intellectually rigorous books in collaboration with authors who like being published by them. However Salt have yet to create a robust business model even though they have been pushing boundaries to achieve this – most particularly in their innovative use of social media to promote the company and its authors.
Baby steps....
The closure is due to rising rent prices for the prime Rice Village site that TwoRows has occupied for the past 14 years, and the owners being unable to sign an acceptable lease agreement. Currently, there are no plans to reopen or attempt to move to a new location.
It's not too bad a sunscreen base but I think my Anessa Mild Sunscreen does a better job to be honest. I'm not quite sure the point of it being tinted, and neither does it leave my skin extra moisturised and I'm pretty sure it would perform similarly when it comes to being sweat/sebum-proof.
Not understanding how it works. Many people don’t realize the full scope of our past lives. They think that karma is a form of reward or punishment. Karma is a harmonizing law. The goal is to bring life back into balance and harmony. When you initiate a destructive action you disturb that natural harmony. Karma is the retuning process which can be painful at times. A constructive action accentuates the natural law of harmony creating more beauty in your life.
The Guidance further states that the primary goal is to examine whether the marketing authorization holder (MAH) information for the reporting period is in accord with previous knowledge of the product’s benefit-risk profile. Reporters will be required to summarize new safety information that could impact the benefit-risk profile of the drug, as well as important new efficacy/effectiveness information since the last report. Where important new safety information has emerged, the reporter will be expected to conduct an integrated benefit-risk evaluation for approved indications.
Pryn's Blog - Evie
Off came the sleeper in record time, and we ran back into the bathroom. Not convinced we'd have much more success, I left her sitting there while I ran to the basement to grab her wubby for nap time. She seemed less scattered, though, and more intent on the job at hand.
1 Ball of (We prefer Bel Gioioso) Mozzarella cut into bites
We both gaze at the tiny writing -
CAS-ual Fridays Challenge is as easy as 1-2-3 this week! Create a project featuring a patterned, an image and a sentiment! The wonderful sponsor is Clear and Simple Stamps, whose cool stamps I featured on my project today!
Blue Ivy Birthday
In the evening this time.
If you're temporarily overwhelmed, get respite care, use relatives, friends, social services or, as I said, abandon the child in a safe place of care - this will at least bring your plight to the attention of authorities. Murder is never an option - no child is better off dead - that's a decision for trained doctors in very extreme cases, never for parents.
even though my father made the frame.
Papers : Western Romance Collection, Looking Ahead All About Me, Vellum Trendsetter - All by Webster's Pages
And one last image where you can see the sand coloured hood for a stylish ride even when it's raining:
Then, in the wake of an accidental cliff collapse, Jack discovers a seam of unimaginably valuable jewels, to which he manages to lay legal claim just as ZaraCorp is cancelling their contract with him for his part in causing the collapse. Briefly in the catbird seat, legally speaking, Jack pressures ZaraCorp into recognizing his claim, and cuts them in as partners to help extract the wealth.
all my 12 courgette plants amongst the flowers and was stunned when they all grew, and grew, and grew - they looked quite nice amongst the rest of the garden when I planted them. I had no idea of the size they would become nor how many of the things I would be stuck with! So just the one for this year!
As you do know I was away three weeks in January on holidays and February has left me with the winter Blahs.
Comment and let me know!
The food was so good. I’m not entirely sure what kind of spices they used in everything, but it hit the spot. Chicken, fried plantains, some kind of spicy cole slaw, and from what someone told me, the meat from the shellfish that comes from the conk shell. I didn’t know what it was until after I was almost done, but wasn’t expecting that. Still, very good.
Just spread the word in SOME way and you're entered! And if you spread the word in extra ways, you of course get extra entries :)
Hi girls and women if you want to enjoy me.so please contact me on my cell number.If you want to meet me only call me and i am come for you.i am live in Ludhiana .if you live in Ludhiana meet me in my city Ludhiana very easily.
In it is a comparison of the resources allowed to Sacramento City Police versus those allocated to the Sheriffs Department. The amount of coverage area of the Sheriff is substantially more than City Police and includes the Sacramento County Jail as well as the Rio Cosumnes Correctional facility in Elk Grove. Maybe this is the source of the bad attitude that my interviewee spoke of, and I myself have encountered upon requesting assistance.
I was unimpressed, to say the least. I didn’t read the other three (two? How many were there?) books until one summer when I was working at camp, age seventeen, supervising a cabin of eleven-year-old girls. I never planned to read them. I was surrounded by sixth graders who were obsessed with them, and as one of them reasonably pointed out to me, “You can’t diss them until you’ve read all of them.” So I did. Never mind that I did it for the sole purpose of being able to diss them. I read them all – all three, five, twelve, umpteen hardbound volumes of sensational and somehow simultaneously boring smut. I was also reading Les Mis at the time. I said to the same girl, “You should try something like this. It’s much better.” She glanced at the 1400-page tome and said, with a deadpan face any comic would have envied, “That’s the scariest thing I’ve ever seen.”
Until now this ‘government’ created by the Act of 1871, has ruled over the rest of us as our very own ‘SHADOW GOVERNMENT’ and when the public demanded to know what was going on after 911: Instead of giving us the answers we deserved the feds gave us The Department of Homeland Security to “Dominate, Intimidate & Control” the public in the post-911 era.’
Each year over 40 MILLION animals are killed for their fur including dogs and cats. MILLIONS more die for leather, wool, down, silk and other items of clothing, accessories and furnishings.
The final part, Part 3 of the subbing…….. Geun~!! Finito~!! Owarimasu~!!! ^^v
And I know how the story goes,
For the pizza:
Afterward I came home and collapsed on the couch watching A Christmas Story.
We then walked back to the car, made our way back to the hotel and began packing for our return trip the next day. I have to say that I was awed by the whole trip. I felt so at home and so welcomed in Ireland. As Mary Brennan said, I got a restful sleep when I came home to the ancestral homeland in Sligo. I came to the conclusion that there were far too many years between visits and I have to get back again sooner rather than later.
Last week the Frilly's showed you what they created, so now it's the Funkie's turn (one is me). You can make either type, frilly or funkie, and link up this week before the challenge ends on May 1st. There will be two winners - one random pick will receive a $15 gift certificate to the Funkie Junkie Boutique, and one favorite pick of the design team will receive a winner's badge to display on their blog. If you need inspiration, please visit the Design Team Member's blogs.
Up top of the picture we have chocolate fudge, which was both chocolatey and fudgey, but those balls at the bottom …
The minerals selenium and zinc are also important nutrients in the ovarian cancer diet. Omega-3 essential fatty acids such as flaxseed oil or evening primrose oil are recommended as well.
In more positive news, I lost 3.6 pounds this week. And I fit into my Goal #1 jeans. I am still very muffiny in them, so I can’t wear them out of the house, but I am very close to being able to do so. So, I’m pretty excited about that.
I now live on a campbed in my kitchen and have done so (1st on the floor until Nov when I bought campbed) since July2011. Eastbourne Environmental Health are fully aware of this.
1. Nelson Mandela, first president of post-Apartheid South Africa and joint Nobel Peace Prize winner (1918 - )
I think they are by are the best Challenges. For this Challenge Emma is asking that we use a frame on the item that we create. Throwback Thursday Challenges are for us to use OLDER Cricut carts. I have to say that I have been slacking on using my Cricut.
I'm gonna take your money
+Free rubber stamps each month of your term
Geraldo actually used the word “gangsta” and kept saying “gangsta,” really overemphasizing the “sta” of the “gangsta” to an extent that I stuck my hand into a food processor so I could concentrate on something else.
- In Singapore it is illegal for a person to walk around the house naked and not flushing the toilet. Also a person can be executed if they are found in possession of more than 200g of cannabis resin. Oral sex is banned unless it is used only during foreplay and if a person is caught littering the streets he is forced to make an appearance on TV with a bib around his neck saying "I'm a litterer."
I've spent years loving this site and just the other day... My very own collection (Oh Happy Day) was added to their store. I'm geeking out a bit over it and I can't believe that I can check this dream off my bucket list.
Next I cut a piece of Whisper White card stock 2-1/2" x 3". I stamped the flower image from Precious Butterflies by using the Rock-N-Roll technique with Wisteria Wonder and Concord Crush. Then I drew on the stems with the large end of the Pear Pizzaz marker. Then the greeting from Messages for Mom was stamped onto the bottom of the card stock in Concord Crush ink.
My IndieGoGo campaign to save my laptop and essentially my studio was a HUGE success. I can’t thank enough all the people who donated and helped me promote my campaign. You’re all wonderful!
At this link, you can take a virtual tour of the place. Such fun! except that it makes me seasick because I'm such a dolt with the mouse. Blarrrgghh. Slow down, Zick.
I have used the May 1 release set, In God's Hands. I love the sentiments in this set! In my photo it is hard to make out the verse, but it reads "I will not forget you! Behold, I have inscribed you on the palms of my hands." Es. 49:11 Isn't that a wonderful thought? When you think of the nail scars on Jesus' hands, picture YOUR name inscribed there! He did that for each one of us! I stamped the hand image with VersaMark, and then the verse over top and embossed it all in Gold EP. I used a simple layout, because I wanted the impact of the verse and image to take center stage, and the cross just reminds us how He inscribed us on the palms of His hands. Love this set!
snake-like
Scarily there are a lot more quirkinesses, but that's quite enough. I maybe should see a doctor. Gadjo?
A lunch stop - checking emails and the weather map on the side of the road.
First I gave the back splash three coats of white Rust-oleum,
Why is marriage so hard? I knew there would be struggles, but this is so much work, and now that I'm a mom, I'm really tired! I was relieved to find compassion in Jesus' teaching in Mathew 19. He says, "'Not everyone is mature enough to live a married life. It requires a certain aptitude and grace. Marriage isn't for everyone....But if you're capable of growing into the largeness of marriage, do it'" (vv.11-12 The Message). I'm convinced that if we are married, we are capable of growing into the largeness of marriage with God's strength. But it is a huge undertaking, something we must grow into. Marriage is a relationship we start learning about the day we get married, and if we're smart we'll keep learning for the rest of our lives.
-GRANULAR type is mostly used to make couscous along with durum flour.
Today was no exception...I was trying to eat dinner but I just couldn't seem to stand the thought of food. I started getting a craving for Motts applesauce...which of course doesn't exist here (and actually I don't recall seeing applesauce in the grocery stores...) so James googled recipes and started making me homemade applesauce. An hour and a batch of applesauce later...no dice. I couldn't eat it. By this time I had a hankering for pudding...you know the chocolate Jello kind. So James goes to the store, buys the closest thing here (Angel Delight) and whips it up....no dice. Poor guy, struck out on both accounts. Later on after he finished cleaning up the kitchen he made himself a bag of popcorn and settled down next to me. I then ate his entire bag of popcorn. Seriously, James had no chance of getting any. Either I am the world's worst wife or I married the most patient guy ever.
But there are deeper levels to this myth, beginning with Tiresias’ prognostication in the text itself: it is self-knowledge that will lead to the youth’s early death. Many mystics and new-age inclined people think of self-knowledge, getting in touch with one’s inner being, reality, or essence, is the ultimate and peaceful goal of all spirituality, when in reality an authentic pursuit of self-knowledge involves taking in one’s shadow, “warts and all,” and can be a desolate and frightening process indeed. Society knows without saying so that self-knowledge is dangerous at any age, and does everything possible to prevent one from gaining it quite often, and that includes that part of society known as religion.
Is that what’s it’s like to lose control?
I wanted a more masculine feel for the card, so used the fishtail flag die instead of the die that comes with the stamp set.
The official crime statistics are heavily massaged by the corrupt, and sometimes complicit, ANC government, and their staggering lies reported unquestioningly by a media, who earlier this actually reported with a straight face that crime rates were higher in Britain.
C) Shared four-person taxi from Santa Maria to hydroelctrico train station = S 15 pp
It IS kind of cool how they’ve set this up, ACC, with the contenders for faction leader all squaring off with the server-wide push to gather resources to eliminate some of them before the big final match-up. Right now on my server it looks like there are a LOT of people running around crafting the Negative Ads needed to wear down the contending mini-bosses, although I kind of have to wonder if that ends up weakening whoever comes out in the end if it’s not a runaway victory. Then again I guess there are the Fundraising dailies, where some of the Negative Ad debuff can be offset by pouring money into somebody’s campaign fund. (And I thought the Shattered Sun Offensive were bad about asking for handouts – at least THEY gave you their “of the Shattered Sun” name tag for your troubles.)
Communication is always an important factor but even more so with collaborating with another writer. You have to be able to “be together” even when you’re not. And this can be problematic when time zones come into play – looking at my watch right now, it’s 3:24pm here in Pennsylvania but if I were talking to a friend in, say, Australia, it’s 5:24am tomorrow morning. Thankfully we have emails, Tweets, messages, and even Skype to keep this big old world smaller than ever.
to watch the streets fill up with snow.
Now it’s a scientific fact.
Recently promoted, Schirmacher has been working long hours, which means she doesn’t always spend much time with her children while her husband is feeling the frustration of not being able to land a new job.
Preheat the oven to 350°F. Lightly butter and flour an 8X8 pan. Whisk together the melted butter and sugar in a bowl.
The lyrics, too, are a bit more clear: the first line "Drop out of life with bong in hand" is easier to understand, as is the classic, "Lungsmen unearth the creed of Hasheeshian."
Well... then there's my epic fail.
I don't know how things turn from "checking e-mail" to "changing the default color scheme and the screen resolution into something awful" without knowing how they did it. I didn't know what 'ctrl+x' did for the longest time, but my mom would somehow figure out how to do all that before a Google search even finished. "It must be a virus." No, it's not, you're just retarded. Is what I'd like to say, if I didn't have to worry about getting grounded.
Are all the same
(Drum roll please). Now, without further ado, I would like to recognize the following writers:
However, Kevin is concerned some people don’t understand what it means to work in the green sector. While the number of students entering environmental studies programs is on the rise, the number of graduates is declining. This is because many new students are confused about what it means to be an environmental professional, says Kevin.
She tried to explain it to me. That it was a social behavior. That it was the appropriate thing to do. To let people know that things would be OK. To give them the feeling that everyone cared, and was concerned.
He was asked to find a solution as Harpreet was still unmarried and unwilling to go in for an abortion. He then consulted staff nurse Dalbir Kaur, known to him since long.
After seeing the exhibition, I was curious about the construction process and the lovely Louise was only too happy to answer my questions. So, if you can't get to the show in person, I hope my mini interview sheds some light on how these beautiful creatures are created.
Well I have never been awarded an Honorable Mention scholarship, so I had to look that up. It appears this is “a commendation given to a candidate in an examination or competition who is not awarded a prize.” But I did get a prize- there was money attached! What is a commendation? Oh- “an award involving special praise” – I see… Sometimes we just have to be happy with what we get. Maybe they had a record that I was awarded the Nikon Scholarship Award in 2003? I guess I can smile about getting an Honorable Mention- that is an honor as well anyhow.
You might want to know that there is a pre-Christmas market at EPIC on Thursday 23rd, and then a break until 15 Jan. And despite the rains, there's still plenty of cherries to be had.
"That's a weird name. I think I might have preferred Jack! I don't wanna be running around the beach asking if anybody has seen a shag?!"
Noodle Tools outlines are due on Monday.
3. Add a line to give it punch. Why does it matter?
I decorated the box with Marianne Creatables LR0125 snowflake dies, layered with foam tape and added the same heart that I did for the card. That little heart is so cute and a perfect little embellishment!
Today there are several modern personal equipments and cleaning and disposal systems available to assist in infection control. However a simple procedure like hand washing still remains extremely vital and is in fact one of the most effective ways to prevent the spread of infection, and thus must be followed at all times without fail.
The tendential fall in the rate of profit is described curiously by Stiegler as something Marx posits in a particular way, but that Marxists, and ‘probably Marx’ did not understand it this way; that is: capitalism as ‘a dynamic system threatened by a limit that would be reached if the bearish tendency to which the very functioning of the profit rate gives rise were to achieve completion’.[vi] I am particularly interested in this bear. An animal that Marx does not reason with, according to Stiegler, even if this strange beast does not invalidate Marx’s identification of the tendency.
She was his ‘baby momma’.
When stars much more massive than our Sun reach the end of their lives, their final demise is marked by a dramatic supernova explosion that destroys most of the star.
This is going to be a very brief post. Today has been a positive day, but my wonderful husband decided to share his cold with me. So, I am not feeling the best tonight.
Yesterday on our way back to the campsite Hubby drove by my parents home from 1960 through 1979.
SIX-WORD CELEBRATION: mini-challenge
Ok…now back to what I MADE using HER designs……..I SO hope the person receiving these loves them as much as I do……
Confident of my background in science and engineering, I decided to try my hand at translating the Vedas… you can see my first effort here : Prathama Suktham.
I will choose a winner at random.
Slobolt leaf lettuce (June?).
He is as fastidious about his appearance and dress as Diana Wynne Jones' Chrestomanci, as clever in anticipating others' actions as Sherlock Holmes and as ruthless as Che Guevara.
So go grab some of these beers (or if you can't find any of them for some reason, a couple honorable mentions are below), get ready to harass some Cardinals fans, and head towards Stadium Drive to put in some quality tailgating time this season.
Stamps: Four Frames, For the Family
I actually WATCHED a show on television (I couldn’t make this up if I tried) where teens show off their, mega, opulent, oversized, disgustingly big rooms/suites. The suites are housed in super big houses, near billiard rooms, bowling alleys and ice skating rinks. Seriously. No joke. I am both fascinated and nauseated by this show, mostly nauseated. Okay, definitely all nauseated and totally disgusted.
They also had some pretty work-type-shirts that I really liked, especially that pink number, mmm, gorge and only 22€!
$85, plus shipping.
“Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a self-protected entity may, for cybersecurity purposes — (i) use cybersecurity systems to identify and obtain cyber threat information to protect the rights and property of such self-protected entity; and (ii) share such cyber threat information with any other entity, including the Federal Government…
Keep an eye on it.
"The whole process of putting out our first LP has been such a long time coming and we appreciate everyone’s patience so far. The past year and a half of our lives have been focused around this record and with that came a lot of situations that we never thought we’d find ourselves in. It’s some shit that we’ll tell our grandkids about. Anyway - what’s important is that the recording process for our first full length record is finished. Walter Schreifels produced it and Will Yip engineered it at Studio 4 in Conshohocken, PA. SideOneDummy is putting it out. We couldn’t be more excited about that combination. Everyone involved is on the exact same page as us and that’s what we have been working so hard towards since we started even thinking about making this record. We are happy to get things moving on such a positive note and with such an amazing group of people. Keep your ears to the ground for more information and thanks to everyone for everything.
In an interview provided to the John DePetro Show on News Talk 630 WPRO and 99.7 FM, Mayor Leo T. Fontaine of Woonsocket. indicated he would not capitulate to the group’s request.
Hard Assets Investor: At Inside Commodities last December in New York City, you presented a line chart that compared gold prices to U.S. federal debt and showed the parallel trajectory lines of both. With debt increasing every day, your charts say gold will keep increasing, right?
What do you want to say about Existence?
I, for one, will be there! As a matter of fact, I am writing the program essay about Pandora's Box for the Festival booklet, and, I will be signing copies of my "Louise Brooks edition" of The Diary of a Lost Girl following the film.
- Works with DMS Team Lead to identify training needs as it relates to specified process area.
Maybelline Mousse blush in Pink Frosting
While these concerns may be legitimate, I think that the church desperately needs to discern how best to go about influencing our secular culture. Often I find that the message is compromised by the method being used. There are too many examples of Christians resorting to militant behavior. Change is sought by trying to leverage power and coerce others into following suit.
On a side note, Bruce and I went to the Greek Festival in downtown Salt Lake last night. It was packed!! We had no idea what we were getting into, and that the line for food would ever be so long. It would have taken us hours to get through it, so instead we got some pastries, left, and went across the street to Tony Caputos. It was so good! But now we know for next year, the Greek Festival isn't worth it, especially when we have a few favorite Greek restaurants around town.
I rest while he does 20 kb swings (40kkg I think)
We stayed at his grave for a time, then I went back and waited in the Jeep while Katie walked over to Jill's grave and sat for awhile. She talks to her mom out loud when she's there. I couldn't hear what she was saying, but I could see that they were having a serious talk. After a few minutes, she got up and walked back to the parking area where I was waiting. She got in the Jeep and closed the door, and I could see that she had been crying. I asked her if she was okay, and she just nodded her head and looked out the window. I knew from experience that meant she was still processing her thoughts, and she would talk to me about it when she was ready. We started toward home in silence.
Update 8/29: Concurring opinions from several young men at Free South Carolina (video). Great quotes: "Managed dissent is not dissent." "The United States very cleverly learned from these other totalitarian and repressive societies: As long as there are these little outlets for people's tension and exasperation. The vast majority of them will be content to express their dissent this way. Ultimately, it is not dissent. It is peaceful, it is non-meaningful, it is non-change inducing."
So one day while browsing one of my favorite stores, I found a roll of wrapping paper that I knew would be perfect for my drawers.
Other recommendations include the saganaki, the gołąbki (cabbage leaf stuffed with rice, veal and vegetables – above), lamb croquettes and the Russian style chicken stroganoff. But the winner of all of this is the Blintzes. They’re absolute heaven on a fork, with smoked salmon, sour cream and fresh herbs ($16)
My plan is to play around with this on some little items and make sure I know what I'm doing before I get serious about painting the french dining room suite. Should be fun!
Have a lovely week; tonight I will resume holiday gift posts.
I love this time of the evening. It is special time, alone time, just the two of us sharing an imaginary world found between two slipcovers. We are transported to places far away and dreamy. I wonder, as I read, where fruit bats really live. My daughter wonders about the trees in the illustrations and why they have been drawn to look like poles instead of the leafy green towers of strength we are accustomed to here in P.E.I.
As we see them, the logjam of cars starts to break up and I begin to see why there was such a holdup. We were approaching a narrow bridge and the police had stopped all the traffic to allow the protesters to cross the bridge safely without having to worry about the traffic.
Now we have a job to do, coz we know that we are on the brink of independence but we are not independent yet!
In February, Sumathi had filed a RTI Application with the G.I. Registry requesting for all the information pertaining to the G.I. Application for ‘Darjeeling Tea’. The intention was to use the information for our research and also to make it available, in a scanned format, for all of our readers. The ‘Darjeeling Tea’ application is particularly important because it is considered by many to be India’s first successful venture in the field of G.Is.
well you can't take her from me, or anyone or anything
Moon, Ziggy, Shag and Kelly all looked at each other. The smell of disappointment, worry and fear were in the air.
Stop. Don't gloat. This is bad new for us in several ways.
difference? The above mentioned immediately seeking a specialist whereas now I just need to get off my butt and move and eat more nutritionally. : ) Yeah, they still talk about the rest of the health risks, but that’s good information to know. My Dr says I’m doing great and it can only get better right?
260. Roasted Vegetables w/ Pan Seared Peaches & Microgreen Salad w/ Peaches & Dried Currants @ Home (Phoenixville, PA) 8:03 p.m.
Randomville is a national, pop culture webzine that has been around for over seven years. We have writers and editors all over the country and draw readership from all over the U.S. and beyond. Through mostly word of mouth, we have grown to become an established and credible indie online webzine, with an ever-growing unique visitor count each month. We are routinely invited to some of the biggest festivals in the country and in
This may not necessarily have been caused by the economic downturn, since a similar trend has continued in Europe regardless of business cycles.
Lindsay Newby – North East Business Centre Manager
Not really much to update..
LESSON 6. Ants. They appear everywhere, but they are mostly small ones. You can talk to them and tell them to go somewhere else – sometimes they listen and go, but mostly they come back. They quickly move away dead insects they find, and are usually not a problem if they don’t get in the house. However, they can be a nuisance when they get together with mealy bugs. Ants eat the sweet excrement of mealy bugs, so what they do is carry the mealy bugs to the top of plants, and kind of farm them. But the mealy bugs damage and kill the plants. They are kind of white globs. I usually remove them with a wet tissue, unless it is a bad infestation, and then I cut the affected area off and throw it away – not into the compost. I don’t want ants on the ground, so occasionally wash the concrete with dishwashing detergent, which kills them.
“That answer is also clear: we must give Afghanistan the opportunity to stabilize,” the president said from behind a podium emblazoned with his official seal, with several armored vehicles parked behind him. “Otherwise, our gains could be lost, and al-Qaida could establish itself once more. And as commander-in-chief, I refuse to let that happen,”
“Uhhhhh,” I uttered, a moment too long, “it’s mine.”
Snarky captions provided by LG Productions, Inc. They're fully copyrighted worldwide so please don't try to impress your friends on New Year's Eve by stealing these without our permission.
Major Publishers Turn Amazon Down
“Oh… thanks,” but the trendy, coffee house girl had already returned to retire to the kitchen.
As of 2012, these two chamberings are the most commonly available centerfire pistol chamberings in the U.S. ; though both chamberings were originally available in a single firearm, and have been strongly associated with those firearms, such that some people still refer to them as "9mm luger" and ".45 colt" (though both are inaccurate, and the second is ambiguous, because it's also commonly used for a large .45 caliber revolver chambering, developed about 40 years before the .45acp).
The next pharmacy was a little affair in a gentrified part of town. It was wedged in nicely between a family owned bakers and an organic greengrocers which sold mostly cherries and pumpkins. I peered in through the pharmacy window, around the cardboard cut-out display of a beaming family all off their heads on garlic pills. Behind the counter was a young pharmacist, natural blond hair, PH neutral skin and a neck which looked like it would smell of peppermint drops. I turned to Anne and nodded. “Perfect,” I said.Then: “How do I look?”
Sometimes I’m in Capable, and I go there more often as I’m getting older.
792 Eastern Parkway at Kingston Avenue
“A classic is a book that has never finished saying what it has to say.”
These same writers now have a blueprint for the coming inflation. Along with this inflation, this devaluation of our currency, we will see economic contraction (as we are already seeing) and that will directly affect you. Jobs will be lost. Companies will fail. It could easily be your company, or your job.
Massachi
Blend spinach leaves in food processor. Add chickpeas, parmesan cheese, salt and smoked paprika. Blend briefly so it retains a little texture. Stir in besan and corn crumbs until it is firm enough to be able to handle. Make into flat patties with damp hands. I made 9 burgers. I put them straight onto the grill because they were very fragile. Spray with oil and grill for about 5-10 minutes until dry and very lightly browned. Turn over and spray the other side with oil. Grill until lightly browned.
How is it that this Dion record failed to become a big hit in America? It went all the way up to #17 in Toronto, Ontario, Canada on the 1050 CHUM survey. But it peaked at only #73 on Cashbox and didn't even make it into the Billboard Hot 100. It appeared briefly at #103 on the Bubbling Under chart instead. I guess you could say this is a record nobody wants!
1 consciousness
I think I am finally getting close to being over him, but last night I was hit with the ultimate challenge: he told me he has a new girlfriend. I handled it extremely well and I know he was very relieved because only a couple months earlier I had foolishly let him know that I would be devastated when he got a new girlfriend. I think probably even three weeks ago, before I left on my trip, my reaction would’ve been closer to that, but I learned a lot on my trip.
It is sometimes said soldiers, prostitutes, and cops have one thing in common: they need to remain emotionally detached to ply their craft. Chief Detective Michael Joseph is losing that detachment, and he know that's dangerous.
if the tops of your garlic are turning brown and dying back...
When it's bad
I will certainly continue to post here, as often as is possible. Perhaps not on a daily basis as I have done thus far, but I do have several evenings to myself every week while Ashley is working, and there is sufficient downtime that I should be able to write in privacy. Not writing doesn’t worry me. It’s what I will write about, and what it will sound like, that troubles me. I don’t want to be unhappy again.
tacked to humility all day,
We were pretty stoked that there was a wine and art festival with in biking distance of our home (though we didn't actually bike there cause apparently last weekend when KJ rode there on the busy city streets he was terrified and thus unwilling to do it again).
Not that there isn’t any place for applause in church. For example, when a member is celebrating her 100th birthday or another member has been chosen as valedictorian of her class, applause may be the right response. It’s acknowledging the achievements of God’s people. It’s rejoicing in community.
First I tried a pumpkin:
distinguished by the Epaulettes and Rows of Lace on the Sleeves, as in the Full Dress.
So I thought it would be interesting to show you my Chucks collection. The first two pair are the new ones, followed by the old ones. Now remember- except the purple xxhigh ones, these are all thrifted.
14. You are about to begin reading Italo Calvino's new novel, If on a winter's night a traveler. —Italo Calvino, If on a winter's night a traveler (1979; trans. William Weaver)
Thanks so much to Nicole for sending in her layout! Isn't it fabulous. Love the dark blue and green together! You're little guy is adorable! And, love what you did with the WordArt! Great alteration :)
Wennborg H, Magnusson LL, Bonde JP, Olsen J. Congenital malformations related to maternal exposure to specific agents in biomedical research laboratories. J Occup Environ Med 2005; 47: 11-19.
But the Game of Thrones cover caught my eye and my fancy, and I decided to read. Sometime you just know, you just sense what’s going to help launch you in the direction of a new novel. I sensed the article might be a good read, and it was. It’s TV-guide-feature short, entitled “All the Kings Men” and is written by Kate Hahn. It doesn’t seem to be on their website yet, but maybe if we wait…
Friday night my friend Christina took me to see Sugarland in concert! Sugarland is one of my very favorite groups so I was really excited! I normally carry the 5th Avenue Thirty- One purse but for the concert I wanted something I could hold closer to my body. I am married to Captain Safety Pants after all. So I pulled out my Organizing Shoulder Bag. I love this bag because I can wear it cross body and it holds a ton of stuff while staying nice and flat. Plus, with all the pockets you know just where everything is. I grabbed the About Town Blanket since we were sitting on the lawn at the concert and we were ready to go! Loved how the About Town Blanket performed. I saw tons of people struggling to carry big quilts and blankets. Me, all I had to do was hold my blanket by the handle. It unrolled and gave us plenty of blanket to sit on. The back kept us dry and the fleece top was nice and soft.
YOU ROCK!!!
4. In dogs, they all want to sniff the newbie's butt. Who's that new dog at the park? What's his story? Should I pee on him? In social media, we all tend to google and search for dirt on new users. Who's that new blogger? Has anyone ever met that newbie with only 3 followers? Before you get started in social media, be sure that you clean up your Facebook and Myspace (may it rest in peace) accounts. No one needs to find that photo of you doing a keg stand in your sister's bikini and high heels when sniffing your online butt.
Topsy-Turvy
One room living on opposite shifts isn’t gonna work to well.
This book gave me a whole new outlook on my children and all children. Kohn clearly explains the problems with a lot of the mainstream "wisdom" about parenting. In doing so, he challenges the effectiveness of discipline, and offers an alternative way to parent, focusing on "love and reason."
How do we ensure that our up and coming generation does not relegate their view of greatness solely to status, bling, glitz, glamour, and material possessions? Admittedly, this is difficult when every sociological influence is pressing us to believe that the aforementioned are the hallmarks of “great.” How do we ensure that service and love drive us who are called to be spiritual leaders? How do we keep the drum major instinct pure?
After all it is life sustaining, food. It provides us with our most basic need and I am so grateful to all of the beautiful people who showed us this kind of love. You fed not only our bodies but our souls as well.
I can really like this place. After all It got me through those initial months in tact – or so I thought - because it allowed me to be incredibly understanding and compassionate towards Alex. It stops me getting angry and I can take on an almost “saint like” attitude of forgiveness! This gives me an amazingly good feeling! Plus I do give myself a rather a large dose of misguided dignity.
She even goes so far as to suggest that “Calvin feels the need to correct the apparent meaning of Paul’s statement lest his readers understand that women lack the fullness of the created image of God” (159). He even allows women to speak in church should God call them in a special situation (164).
Silence will fall. We know, going in to series six, that there is a race called The Silence. They seem to be able to exist without being seen, and if they are seen, they are able to erase the memory of their existence from the individual who saw them. These are the only details I am aware of regarding The Silence. The light from the crack erases people from time, including all memory of said person. Again, this seems to be the power The Silence have. Is the crack a tool being used by them, or is it a thematic link that introduces the concept. “The Doctor in the TARDIS hasn’t noticed.” “The Doctor in the TARDIS doesn’t know.” We cannot see The Silence and, presumably, neither can The Doctor. Are we to believe they have been existing throughout series five, possibly even as far back as series four, the first hints of their existence being SILENCE in the Library? The Doctor has placed much emphasis on noticing things, including The Eleventh Hour where we are given a sequence where The Doctor analyzes the village green. But we don’t notice The Silence. Perhaps, thematically, Steven Moffat has been giving us hints, but they are hints that are devoid of context until now.
This was Norbert’s land, unforgiving of weakness, flinty and inflexible, steely, stony, unyielding; a harsh place mirrored in him. Surely I didn’t belong here, a sprayed and moisturized man of the mall.
after about 20 mins, rahul saiyya gets a call from priya's dad " rahul, we just got this sms saying that rahul is in jail. whats going on? everyone is upset here"
Then, our friend Adam made a visit and gave the quote his own unique spin:
‘Mao,’ again.
Nin’s stories, on the other hand, are brilliantly balanced, progressing steadily in their long waltz to culmination. In “Artists and Models,” (an 8500 word story from the collection, Delta of Venus) she wrote:
I started calling everyone I could, and whadyaknow, not one damn person was answering their phones. My anger was so strong, that I'm pretty sure when they looked down at their phones as I was calling, a picture of Satan showed up, laughing maniacally, until the phone just burst into flames and collected into a tiny pile of demon ash in their hands.
Mali Kingdom
I have a sweet tooth. It causes me to buy multiples of my favorite candy bar (Take 5), though in my defense, I only started doing that because it’s so hard to find in NC. My little munchkins know when they hang out with me we’re going to make something sweet to take home. I love all things Dairy Queen and Krispy Kreme. And I have never had a piece of Old Church Lady Cake in any flavor that didn’t taste like the entryway to Heaven.
I don't use it every week as recommended because that's just ridiculously expensive. Instead, I use it about every 3 weeks. It really does brighten my skin and makes it so soft. I have super sensitive skin too and I've had no problems.
Dad or, maybe, Mum?
Here is how:
When was the last time you snuggled with a skeleton and looked this happy? :) We got back to the house in time to hand out some candy ourselves, and luckily we were just in time to welcome a visit from this adorable group of girls from Trey's class. Trey opened the door and was greeted with all sorts of giggles and girls calling his name - hilarious! We all enjoyed watching Trey's face turn a bright shade of red as he tried to sneak away back into the house. The girls and I finally convinced him to pose for a picture, which didn't actually take too much convincing. After they were gone, Daddy asked if he had a favorite, and he did shyly whisper a name (wait, maybe two). Ah, third grade love, when you don't have to choose just one. :)
Each time I discovered a new beer blog I found yet another through their blog or one of their articles or their blogroll or list of mates. I could see what the pubs were doing with food in Portland, what was new and happening in bars in Texas and Missouri, what craft brewers were doing in New York, what was worth drinking in Canada and I could follow the quest for real ale in London. All this from behind a pissy little laptop and a glass of beer!
My early impressions of the Troll were confirmed quickly. I clearly lack mountain bike riding experience, but I find the Troll an absolute joy to ride both on road and off. It climbs well despite its heft and this deftness is keenly felt when picking albeit tentative lines through boulders and broken trail.
because they have not moved, oliver believes they belong to him. cute little wormy pets.
Joe Maddon asks me to go around Hazleton, and so I do. I drive along Broad Street and Church Street, see some of the businesses that have been serving Hazleton for decades and see some of the darkened windows of business that have gone. I drive past sections of town that have English and Spanish signs, and into neighborhoods that look strikingly like the little street with the little houses where I grew up. I eat in a restaurant that overlooks the valley, and drive by the football stadium where people have gathered for so many years. I stop into the locally famous Third Base Luncheonette where Joe Maddon's mother, Beanie, still works and where, people say, they make the best sandwiches in town.
When you have a kid with autism or any other special need, however, the worrying takes on epic proportions, mostly because these fears are so much more likely to come true than with NT kids. I don't care what a mom of neurotypical kids says; it is NOT the same thing.
So...now its my turn to share some of the love......I would like to share the award with these beautiful girls...
Secondly, Tampax makes it sound like music is a man’s world, female artists suck more, and current female (aspiring) artists should be as male as possible–hiding menstruation–in order to make the cut. Not true, not awesome.
It’s the most wonderful time of the year…except if you’re stuck in a crowded shopping mall doing your last minute gift shopping, that you promised yourself last year you wouldn’t leave until the last minute but here you are again…OH! OH! OH!
PRISONER OF THE INQUISITION by Theresa Breslin Doubleday hbk. £12.99
ingredients (such as salad greens from Rebecca at Persephone Farms).
i was drinking coffee early last night when i felt chilly more than usual. angel was in the restroom cleansing his face and applying facial creams. i heard his cellphone rung and suddenly he was rushing out of the bathroom requesting me to open the gate for thai, our vietnamese friend. i got the electronic key and walked out to the car park, expecting that thai was already waiting. when i got there, i saw a girl sitting on the sidewalk and talking on the phone.
3.) Catholic Education Resource Center - As a Protestant, I can’t go along with everything on this site, however, on the whole, it’s a fantastic presentation of the Christian world and life view. Lots of great articles.
perhaps to new horizons
“I just had the best asparagus ravioli I’ve ever had in my life. My boyfriend got us reservations for a pre-Valentine’s dinner (V-day was all booked up) and we were seated almost exactly at our reservation time. The owner is HYSTERICAL- he is all business, no nonsense but obviously loves his restaurant. The waiters and waitresses had a funny banter going that kept the mood lively. Every table was either full or being cleaned for the next party. The food arrived only 10 minutes after we ordered, but apparently 10 minutes is all they need to cook up a bit of heaven.”–Lisa R.
While I'm thinking about nature and colour. Rape fields. I know they play havoc with people who have hay fever but I love them. There's loads this year and as soon as you walk out the door you can smell that distinctive scent heavy in the air, as you walk you can see the yellow fields peeping through the gaps in the houses. Just love it. Much better than the smell of car fumes.
This is typically eaten as a late night snack food and in company of others while enjoying a beverage. Similar to appetizers we share while having a beer or margarita.
The piece seems to have no understanding of the cost-benefit relationship that advertisers have to deal with. It states
Ready for the Clumsy Dragon?
But back to bags- there are certainly some opportunities in the shopping bag arena for some environmentally beneficial creativity. First up, if you are lacking reusable shopping bags, make yourself some shopping totes that suit your needs- perhaps something that folds up nice and compact, a big roomy bag, a retro crochet bag (link to .pdf), or whichever size and shape you might need, perhaps re-purposing materials you have on hand (ideally natural materials such as cotton that will decompose at the end of their useful life). Second up, make sure you have them on hand when you go shopping, and use and re-use them for as long as possible.
2010.09.14 Pakistan Hangu 1 0 Islamists shoot a journalist to death outside a press club.
The key thing is to go. Backpack, flashpack, luxury – choose your style and get travelling. It would be a great pity to never have explored more than your home country and culture.
The attackers had poured diesel on the house before setting it on fire.
I loved it. I read it (all 300 pages) in two days (that includes several weekend activities), basically, when I had any free time, I was reading it. I woke up this morning and found I was still thinking about it.
There comes a day when even jeans on the loose side turn out to be jeans on the ridiculous side. That day came and it was time to get myself into some new jeans. I’ve probably known that it was time to get into a different size for a few weeks, but I didn’t want to test that theory in case I was wrong. Who needs dressing room heartache? Luckily Momma Bear was here and helped encourage me to get my little buns in the dressing room and try on some jeans…in a smaller size. So after digging through a massive amount of jeans not in my size, I found a pair to try on in my suspected new size. But I still didn’t trust myself, so I brought in the old size as well. At least I would have a backup that fit somewhat…
I admit that at first glance this layout is a bit overwhelming...well for me anyways...but I love how it turned out...and of course I love all of these CTMH products...click on each image for a larger view if you'd like
Now, about Phil Collins: apart from breaking up with his second wife via fax (so what if he didn't; he's capable of it), your comments reminded me of this memorable monologue from American Psycho's Patrick Bateman:
NATO flew 67 sorties and 16 strikes sorties over Libya one day before Qaddafi was killed.
Kṛṣṇa! O mighty-armed Kṛṣṇa who makes his devotees fearless! You alone are the relief for those suffering worldly miseries. You are the Original Person himself, the transcendent master of all energy. You set aside your illusory energy and exist purely within the spiritual energy of your own self. The worlds are full of people with hearts captivated by your illusory energy. Your trademark is that you see to their ultimate welfare by personally inspiring them towards morality, etc. You incarnate in this world just to lighten our burdens, and to fully satisfy your exclusively devoted companions with subject matter by which to always meditate upon you.
I lie about the friends thing...If I had more friends in this zip code I would just be shopping with them.
"The little girl with the puppy. She's always called it her 'I wuv you' - that's what she thinks the little girl is saying to the puppy".
That was OK by me, because the demolition had revealed an old advertisement by that onetime king of outdoor signage, the O.J. Gude Company. It was an ad for Wrigley's gum, with the discernible slogan, "The Flavor Lasts."
Since the tractor was running and the weather was nice Lesley decided to till up some other gardens that still had plant matter in them. The old Brussel Sprout stems and split Cabbages will now have a chance to break down and add organic matter to the soil before we plant in those areas. Lesley is using the same tractor her husband Tom used as a young boy on his childhood farm.
In terms of the mental, emotional, physical and spiritual stuff I will pray. I will pray that God will not only carry me through these trials but that He will fill me in every possible way.
Publisher: Eos
So, for one more year, the needle and thread has come out, some more wax dressing applied and my International shall be embalmed in one more season and take on the new season, hopefully with a new chapter…and hopefully on the Lea.
There is no mention, nor even indication that this man was a Jew. Lysias had thought, according to verse 38, that he was an Egyptian. So what did the people think?
Hope you're enjoying a wonderful Christmas. And Terri (from Home Fedral), if you're reading this... THANK YOU for your time and friendliness in getting us all set up! You're so sweet. Wishing you a very Merry Christmas!!
The story inverted further when Kid reached Mount Zand. Here the monsters had been building a Bastion of their own…
Whose fault is this? Whose hypocrisy is this?
2: Life. It is a simple fact of life that we all have responsibilities; homes to maintain, bills to pay, jobs to do, children to educate etc. Day by day we all face the challenge of meeting our responsibilities. And then, on top of all this, we want – no, we need – to write/paint/compose. How will we ever have time? How will I find the time to learn the craft of writing? Will I ever be able to shape my words, to say adequately what I want to be able to say? Will I be able to write in a way that is popular, engaging, amusing, contemporary, relevant – even successful? These thoughts try to invade our work. They try to shape it into something it is not and never could be. Barkat writes:
It means that you recognize a spotlight will seek you out...when it's the right time....and not the other way around.
Nothing has been reported about what, if anything, is going to be done to the owners/administrators at AgriProcessors.
He put up with a lot, but he did it with style; he never snarled or growled when his ears were tugged, and he was always there to lend a furry shelf to help our son learn to walk. We did end up getting our son one of those Mattel plastic walkers (wonder how long THOSE take to bio-degrade) but he (our son) generally preferred to hang onto to Dudley’s furry back and meander around the house. Dudley, after all, had this walking thing down pat, and our son is nothing if not a quick learner. It must be stated, however, that Dudley was not ever intended to be a guide and/or service dog, so it became a frequent occurrence to hear some muffled footsteps, slowly increasing in pace, until there was a thud and the sound of wailing. Upon further examination, it would appear that Dudley, while being happy to be the mobile crutch our son needed, at times just wanted to get away, so he would step up the pace and spend an increasing amount of time looking behind him to see if this two foot tall shadow was still there. As this was a house, there was only a finite limit of space for this to occur in before they both hit a wall or a largish chunk of furniture at mid-trot. The kid wailed, the dog invariably wet himself.
I simply despise top ten and “best of” lists. They are never enlightening, and even less informative, especially those that discuss music.
"I don't need to endorse him because I am a 100% supporter him of and I've already endorsed him. And I've already, you know -- everybody always asks me 'Are you going to do what you did in 2008?' What I did in 2008, I did because people really didn't know -- my friends didn't even know who he was at the time," Oprah Winfrey told CNN.
The new arrivals to the neighborhood benefited from the charity of wealthier Jewish immigrants who had arrived earlier and funded projects to ease overcrowding and providing health and education services catering to specific religious customs. The Bialystoker building is perhaps the most striking example of this beneficence. Its design is Moorish Art Deco, of a kind you might see off to a corner in Rockefeller Center. Possibly considered plain in its day, but now seen as beautiful and understated. In particular, its doorway is a marvel; the artfully carved BIALYSTOKER is joined by a dozen medallions representing the twelve tribes of Israel.
Daniel Etounga-Manguelle, a Cameroonian thinker, and a former adviser to the World Bank, contends that “What Africans are doing to one another defies credulity. Genocide, bloody civil wars, and rampant violent crime suggest African societies at all social levels are to some extent cannibalistic.” Why? In part, because of the inveterate values held by so many Africans. These, and other causes - and excuses - are examined in Chapter Five, “The Root-Causes Racket.”
3 garlic cloves, minced (or more garlic if feeding a cold sufferer)
And he casually suggested that he'd like to make this on Saturday night and didn't I have plans to be out? Wasn't there a new movie I was just itching to see?
It has been noted that tuition fees will not be charged to Irish students at Scottish universities from next year. This puts them on a par with Scottish students who pay nothing and of course other EU students who will pay nothing either.
“I love you so dearly, Winifrede, that I could eat you were it not for the fact that I can’t bear suet pudding.”
Here are some of my favorite suggestions:
I'll end my diatribe with a song.
Before we got to it, we saw an abandoned motorbike lying on its side, on the pavement, halfway into a bus shelter. There was a dark pool of petrol coming out of it, as if the motorbike was bleeding.
They undoubtedly also bent the stick somewhat polemically against Bakunin who, basing himself on the revolutionary potential of the peasantry, – a potential Marx and Engels showed did not exist because of the atomised nature of the peasantry (see Marx – 18th Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte where his class theory is most clearly set out) -argued for the revolutionary nature of these struggles, but, it seems to me, that, in fact, Rosdolsky was right in the 1920’s when he argued that Marx and Engels based themselves on historical materialism, and that he is wrong in his later appraisal. Marx and Engels theory of Historical Materialism certainly does put class at the forefront of explaining historical development. It is certainly within that context that determination of which forces are progressive can be determined. But it is Economistic to think that class is the only criterion utilised by Marx and Engels in orienting themselves in the world they were in. It is quite obvious that nationality and nationalism were and are important cleavages and ideologies running through societies, as well as class, and, as I said at the beginning, struggles, based around nationality, can only be progressive if they are viewed in the context of historical reality, of who is leading those struggles, and by what means. Indeed, nationality, as a cross cutting cleavage, is one that is usually reactionary it cuts across class lines, dividing the working class, and indeed tending to unite sections of the working class with its own bourgeoisie and petit-bourgeoisie. It is not at all surprising, to me, then, that Marx and Engels, especially at a time of heightened revolutionary activity, such as 1848, but not just at that time, should conclude that some such struggles were reactionary, that those conducting them were incapable of using their own internal resources for achieving their aims, that, in order to do so, they had to ally themselves with reactionary international forces – at that time with Tsarist Russia who Marx and Engels viewed in the same way that some Marxists today view the US i.e. a force to be opposed in all circumstances, and almost to be defeated by any means.
Latin 3: Study for a quiz on Caesar, Gall. 1, pp. 21-26.
Clara's preschool is only four days a week so for one more year I get a little friend to hang out with on Fridays. This is a really special time for me. The days themselves are pretty mundane; we snuggle on the couch for a while then plan out our day and run errands. Sometimes we go have lunch with Ben or--brace yourself--clean the house. She's a great errand buddy and we both cherish the opportunity to spend time together "just the two of us." Which is not to say that she never slows me down or has a tantrum or gets whiny or talks and talks and talks until I suddenly declare it naptime. She does. But I've been through this before when the older kids, now teenagers, were young and I know that peace and quiet can be overrated. (Someone remind me of that bit of wisdom when I'm pulling my hair out around 7PM some night this week.)
“The painless state of Matter”
Bull Shoals Dam trophy opens again Feb 1st.
We've actually made a few design changes since I created this model, which we'll reveal as we go along. These models were created as "conceptual models" before we even made an offer on the house, to communicate ideas to my husband, our structural engineer, our contractors, and to study the spaces.
If you haven't ordered a copy yet you can buy one here NOW. If you order it soon it should get here in time for Mother's Day-- which would be the PERFECT gift. Tell your husbands ;)
Some of the participants (nearly all whom were running for charity) dress up and there were…
“And there people brought to him a paralytic lying on a stretcher. When Jesus saw their faith, he said to the paralytic, ‘Courage, child, your sins are forgiven.’ At that, some of the scribes said to themselves, ‘This man is blaspheming.’ Jesus knew what they were thinking, and said, ‘Why do you harbor evil thoughts? Which is easier, to say, ‘Your sins are forgiven,’ or to say, ‘Rise and walk’? But that you may know that the Son of Man has authority on earth to forgive sins’ – he then said to the paralytic, ‘Rise, pick up your stretcher, and go home.’ He rose and went home. When the crowds saw this they were struck with awe and glorified God who had given such authority to human beings.”(Matthew 9:2-8, emphasis added)
Rankings reflect the amounts of chemicals present on food when it is eaten. Most samples were washed and peeled before testing. Washing with a “produce wash” is unlikely to help remove pesticides because they’re taken up by the entire plant and reside on more than just the skin, the report says.
First off, how on EARTH did you notice something like that? Man, I better make sure I never have spinach in my teeth when I post a picture of myself! And yes, I have a tattoo of a fish on my ankle. It seemed like a good idea when I was 18 and knew everything.
Perl-Nennig, in the middle of the Mosel wine yards in the south west of Germany on the boarder to Luxemburg houses the Guide Michelin 3-star Victor´s Gourmet Restaurant Schloss Berg.
Again Mr. Digby ran his forefinger along his chin.
I draw cash at the ATM while the people in queue keep an embarrassed
As much as I agree with existing gender differences, it’s strange for me to think of our boys as… well… educational liabilities. Lumping them together and trying to come up with a dossier of strategies that are supposed to, in effect, save our boys. But perhaps I’m being too sensitive. They DO have target groups like this in the non-profit world for girls, such as the most recent campaign called Because I Am a Girl, and no one really complains about groups like that. As a society, we can see that girls are at a disadvantage, so we actively try to even the odds.
03 - Gator Country 07:38
Last night I figured out how to get the country of origin stats for my readers.
And if luck would have it, Kareena and Aishwarya may have a face-off at the Cannes red carpet this year, to be held from May 16 to 27. However, sources also inform that both the actresses won’t be walking the red carpet at the Cannes on the same day. So, let’s see if we to see some friction between the heroines!
In our dining room, it looked like pictures I had seen of the territorial prison in Yuma.
Here, little Dickie and Janie, wearing gleeful smiles on their cherubic faces, are being chased. By a fanged, cape-clad, gray-faced vampire.
Pierce each melon wedge with a pop stick, and arrange in a bowl.
This can be added to your baked goods, pancakes, waffles, you name it. I'll be adding it to our smoothies.
means for coupling a calling party station to a special exchange;
Economics start with photosynthesis.
Next, should be a move to separate the “professional” part of the sport from the “amateur” part of the sport. Either by actually splitting them into two distinct organizations, or by moving the “professional” half of the sport into its own self sufficient Division with a “President” at the helm reporting directly to the CEO – replete with separate budgets, funding sources, Mission Statement, goals and objectives, operating guidelines, etc. in order to actualize our potential internationally, I believe there needs to be more focus in this country on our professional/international programs and athletes, because as I said last week, twenty five medals WITHOUT a real program in place says that so much more is possible.
One of the easiest ways to monitor your reputation is by setting up a Google Alert which will inform you of anything that has appeared about you online. Google Alerts are email updates of the latest relevant Google results based on your choice of query or topic. Go to www.Google.com/Alerts and set up a free alert on your name and your firm’s name. Whenever anything appears online that you or someone else has posted about you, an email will be sent to you with a link to the online occurrence. It can be overwhelming to reflect on how much has changed in marketing over the past few years. And it can be even more overwhelming to think that marketing continues to change. If you want positive change in your business it may be time to stop ignoring the changes in marketing and embrace them. The smartest move you make in 2012 may be eliminating your old marketing plan and drafting a new, fresh roadmap to winning all the business that you deserve.
Example: You find yourself in Detroit.
Von Richthofen was 23 years of age when I lept from my perch in one of the few remaining trees and ripped him from his horse. He still had 3 years yet to live, though I intended to cut those short right then and there. I’ll say this for the man, he knew how to fall from a mount. I’d intended to incapacitate him in the fall, but he was back on his feet and drawing his pistol before I’d even regained mine own footing. I snatched the pistol away from him and banished it to the land of Tobol Canash in the Riovet warding. I trust the inhabitants made good use of it. I then deftly grabbed him by the boots and tore them from his feet, sending him sprawling, stocking-footed on the ground. I jumped on the prone man and wrapped my hands around his throat, feeling what little fight he had left fade from his body.
I spread out the jewelry in front of him: a gold bracelet to make up for the time Trip gave me a black eye and I had to hide in my bedroom with the "flu" so Mom wouldn't see; the silver and jade necklace for the "t" on my arm; an expensive watch, just because I was always late; and a heart-shaped pendant, the first gift Trip ever gave me. --Pg. 187-188 of an ARC of "Breaking Beautiful" by Jennifer Shaw Wolf
At one of the positive points in our lives, my childhood friend, Stan said, “When I feel pain, I know I’m alive.”
“I think we owe him a great bit of gratitude and at the same time, we’ve grown beyond that so we’re not relying on martial arts as a calling card to be included in a movie or a film script,” said Adachi.
The St. Petersburg Philharmonic Orchestra will perform at UC Davis' Mondavi Center in Jackson Hall.
I have come to the conclusion that lepers are simply make believe creatures, like the unicorn, the griffin, and the platypus. If they do exist, it’d be difficult for them to fully blend in, especially in the business world. If you find someone who refuses to shake your hand, perhaps they might suffer from leprosy. A man who regularly shuns high fives must be a leper.
There were a few scary weeks in which the spectacle of her evangelical convictions governing world policy seemed all too possible, but the election results made it clear that the majority was no longer going to be swayed by the Republicans' usual tactics. If she doesn't succeed in furthering her political career, then hopefully Palin will retreat to her outpost in Wasilla, where she can keep an eye out for Russian bombers while teaching little Tripp Easton how to shoot them down.
If the tender family moments aren't your thing, then the mystery will be. The author does an awesome job painting everyone as a suspect. Just when you think someone is cleared, more evidence is thrown their way to cast them in an entirely new bad light. I'm not sure I'd have guessed this time around who was doing the killing and I liked it. The ending brought the story to a statisfying close and I was happy to see Vee gain control over her ability to slide so she can learn to cope with it in the future.
Can Pakatan Rakyat meet the overwhelming challenges? It is a salient fact Pakatan can only do well if they wake up to the new realities of today.
The arrogance of our ruling political elite knows no bounds, especially when it comes to taking responsibility for their actions, or acknowledging the recent message the electorate has delivered them.
I hugged her before she left. And I couldn't wait for us to talk with the orthopedic surgeon.
Regina Spektor has a direct line to my heart. I love her so, so much. I especially like:
Those are Helen Keller's words, not mine.
NOTE: If this post brought a smile to your day, PLEASE share it (*humble groveling…soulful anime eyes*) and help spread the word to everyone on the planet about Super Earthling. Thanks!
Colouring: Polychromatic Pencils
The new minister admitted in parliament that the dangerously high level of human faeces in the rivers, which scientists measure by testing for E. coli bacteria. was caused by sewerage spills from municipal facilities. However again, the underlying lack of engineering skills was not addressed: instead, she lodged notices to municipalities to stop sewerage spills and clean up their act namely: Delmas, Bushbuckridge, Govan Mbeki, Mbombela, Nkomazi, Emakhazeni, Kungwini and Greater Sekhukhune, as well as the Vhembe and Greater Tzaneen municipalities in Limpopo.
Day 11: It is said that Father's and Mother's grieve differently. Do you feel this is true with your angel's father?
She immediately realized what the two statements meant linked as they might be in my mind and her face turned old.
When I was editing this shot I tried my best to make it work in color but something always seemed to look weird with the colors. It did not have that strong impact of contrast I wanted. Now there is a difference between contrast and just making it as dark as possible. Contrast, in my mind, is making certain things stick out and certain things remain hidden. It is a tool to aid in composition and ultimately to focus the viewers’ attention to where you want them. Where does your eye go when you first look at the color image? How about the black and white one?
(written in the pre-metric days)
This week, we feature a Chicago-based band I loved from the 90s....one that didn't make it very big, despite being incredibly talented and having a unique, refreshing sound. The guy who formed the band found the vocalists singing in a subway station for tips.
I'm sure there are more things I could add to this post. I feel like like these things specifically are usually not on checklists so I would blog about them. I hope if any other mommies read this they might be able to add in their own "must haves" for post pregnancy!
Worse, some studies indicate that there are as many as three qualified applicants for every job opening out there. If your talented worker can beat out the other two that means you are losing a very valuable part of your workforce.
2. Leaves and branches positioned in response to light source.
1 Jupiter's Future 15:51
13And the sixth angel sounded, and I heard a voice from the four horns of the golden altar which is before God,
falls of slurry
It was strange, Alec was standing up for me. He was insulting me while he did it, but he was still backing me up.
“They have been harassing her inside prison,” Maryam said. “One of the things she has been doing is making paper toys for her two-year-old daughter. They came in and took away the toys.”
I could barely restrain myself from placing Anne Sophie Bion on the worst dressed list for this wrinkled-garbagebag-wannabe-gown. In the end I decided there were worse offenders, so I've left her here.Tina Fey...I LOVE Tina Fey, but I did not love this gown. I'm using it to illustrate the 'black' trend even though I'm perfectly aware that she's wearing navy. Oh well, close enough. I didn't like the waist apron thing, but I guess if you overlook this detail that will make your hips look bigger than they are it's an ok dress. Gown by Carolina Herrera.Now we move away from the "White and Black" category into the gowns I really didn't love. Given the fact that I'm a plus size, I'll be the last to pick on Melissa McCarthy. However, I think there were nicer gowns out there...she needed to pick something with structure. Billowy gowns tend to make us big girls look even bigger.Michele Williams in Louis Vuitton. While I can't say that this is a 'bad' dress, I just didn't like it and certainly will not be joining the crowd that named her 'best dressed.' First off, if you're going to be on TV, I think you should pick a color that will register well onscreen. I'm told that the coral gown was stunning in person, but all I can see is a red gown. Plus, this gown has the same problem that Tina Fey's does...it adds to the hips. The detailing looks very interesting, though.Rooney Mara in Givenchy. Apparently it's big news that they actress skipped her signature black look and went for a white gown. While I applaud that, and love the contract between the white gown and the black hair, the gown is very poorly fitted in the chest. She revealed on the red carpet that she only selected it the morning of the show, so maybe that was the problem. Can I add...the fashion police kept cooing over this dress' 'structure.' Folks, that gauzy dress has very little structure to it. The woman wearing it is the only thing providing any structure up top.Penelope Cruz in Armani. Okay, before you get mad at me for saying I don't like this, let me open by saying I can't quite pin down why I don't love it. Maybe it's because it didn't fit in with this year's red carpet looks. It was out of place. Maybe it's something with the color...I just kept wrinkling my nose when I saw it. I love Penelope's hair, the cut of the gown is very flattering on her, and I love the way it trails behind her. If I saw her at a White House dinner in this gown I probably would have loved it. She seriously could be Jackie Kennedy...Bernice Bejo. Ouch. I really didn't like this one. It's mint, it's sparkly all over, it has sleeve, it has nude insets in the sleeves. This is far too matronly for a woman as young and beautiful as Bernice. This is seriously something I'd expect to see Hillary Clinton wearing as the mother of the bride. I wish she'd made a more bold selection.Viola Davis in Vera Wang. It was funny...watching the red carpet, everyone was gushing about this gown and how it fit her just right and showed off her assets. Then, when she didn't win the award, the next morning all anyone could say is that the hem was a mess (like someone had gone crazy with the scissors). I respectfully disagree with everyone. The color was great. The top was all wrong...it didn't show off her assets...it left us wondering when they would pour out. And as for the 'messy' hem...I loved it. I do also love that she wore her natural hair. She's gorgeous (apparently she frequently wears wigs for her roles).Maya Rudolph. I'm going for the obvious jab here...it looks like the actress from "The Bridesmaids" is wearing a bridesmaid gown. I like the purple, but I really don't like the silver shoulder pad sleeves.Kristen Wiig in J. Mendel. BAD nude color. Nude is one of things you can or can't pull off, and I don't think this was a hit for Kristen.I guess I'm going to go ahead and pick on the Oscar Winner Meryl Streep (in return, I'm sure God will make sure I don't look half as good at her age). I love the color, I love the neckline, and I'm very happy she won the Oscar. But I don't like the rest of the gown. It looks like she threw on a robe, belted it, and accessorized. Moving into my "Worst Dressed." What was Sandra Bullock thinking???? It's shiny satin on top, dull velvet on bottom (fitted like Morticia Adams' skirt) with this weird spidery belt attacking her midriff. Plus, with few exceptions, I don't think a pony tail is dressy enough for the red carpet. Overall, kind of matronly.Anna Farris. Also matronly. Also a hot sequin mess with sleeves. Add shoulder pads and it's something right out of my 1980's nightmares. Where Mara Rooney's severe black hair cut looked gorgeous with a white gown, Anna's blond do is not complemented by the black gown.Shailene Woodley is almost eleven years younger than I am. I can only pray that several decades will pass before I admit defeat and wear a style like this. It's a 1970's Princess Leia interlock mess. All she was missing were the buns.Yes, that's right, folks. Angelina Jolie is on my worst dressed list. Most everyone is loving this gown on the internet, but I refuse. She's wearing black velvet, and I feel it weighs down this gown. There's too much fabric, her arms are skeletal, that skinny white leg just does not look attractive sticking out of the slit. I normally really like her looks, but this year she's just too skinny, and the dress highlights all the wrong parts. (I looked up the fashion police review of this dress after I wrote this...I can't believe that Joan Rivers and I agree on something)
Thank you, Hydrangea, for being so lovely, so simply four-petalled in your robust panicles, so soft-colored.
In you have follow-up interaction with him in the form of e-mails, form of text messages, short course or even if you meet him because you work at the same place or you go the same café or in special situation keep this interaction relatively short and ideally with text messages I suggest one line, one teasing line something like; I have great time good to see you or see you again something like that. Something that is very short and this will keep the momentum going and now key advise and the key strategy I am to give you is don’t shift to another to clingy, or demanding or needy mode. This probably be the greatest mistake you will make and it will kill the magic.
So as of tomorrow, I'm not going to smoke anymore or I will have to kill someone to prove that I need to smoke. I was going to send my daughter instructions on how to get into my Blogger so she could inform you lovely readers to raise my bail. J came over for a visit and informed me they don't allow smoking in most of the Arizona jails. So what would be the point?
Former coworkers who heard of his plight circulated a sympathy card in my department. It seemed to me that sentiments like “may your memories bring you comfort” and “others care deeply and are remembering your loved one with special thoughts” might be a little premature, even if well intended. It also occurred to me that I didn’t really know the guy, much less his mother, yet was being asked to sign the card.
State Education Commissioner Deborah Gist says her office is reviewing claims of financial mismanagement and poor leadership at the Central Falls School Department. In a written statement, Gist says state officials are in regular contact with Central Falls and she is confident in their oversight.
To eat with apple tart.
I was not even consciously bothering at this point and decided to have as much of a week off as I could. I went out for dinner 3 or 4 nights that week, watched lots of Twin Peaks episodes, listened to lots of different music, did some exercise, and generally tried to do something else, because nothing was working with me at this point. I was a wound up toy-car bumping into the same wall whichever direction I faced. I wasn’t even sure why. I was very frustrated and most likely a pain to be around. Somehow I still wrote things down and toyed with ideas despite myself.
Video amateur accept arise a continued way aback artlessly advancement you to save the princess, and these canicule they added present belief with complex, complete capacity and amusing commentary. Lux-Pain, from administrator Ignition Entertainment, is a novel-style adventitious bold in the attitude of the Phoenix Wright series, and it attempts to bear a agitating acquaintance to Nintendo DS owners. Instead, it is bound tripped up by a deluge of awkward localization miscues, and what little agitative gameplay there is cannot breach its fall.
My 2 Angels – date hatpin
Hmmm, that was interesting. I pondered the thought of having godly abilities and whose child I would want to be, maybe Artemis –if she weren’t the virgin huntress. Or Athena, she was pretty cool and I thought that Ares would have been hot, I definitely wouldn’t want him to be my dad!
We did get to see many more birds, but managing to pick up a recognizeable photograph on the move, doesn't always happen. Consider these my 'record-shots' then.
It's here! Minibox for WordPress - the 3 column Minima knock-off for WordPress. Yeah, that's right. Build it any they will come right? Well you guys sure have come from all over to download the Blogger version so I imagine the WordPress version will put some smiles on a few faces too.
While we are sure the approval will come and before we know it we will be together and enjoying being in one another's arms again. Please continue to pray for us and thank you for your prayer and support you already given. Any news we will share here at Mountain Highs and Valley Lows.
East Midlands raised £4,540.22 for London; our own website shows that we (East Mids) raised the most -£4,540.22. Geoff handed out leaflets 'Racism cuts both ways'. We need to encourage young ones to join, he said, as they have a different perspective having grown up in a multicultural society. About Marxist persecution, Geoff gave the example of the extreme treatment meted out to the Tweeter who made comments only but did not incite anything; and closer to home, our candidate in Lincoln, Dean Lowther, taken in for questioning for making comments on Facebook -someone 'perceived it to be racist! Candidates were requested to close their Facebook accounts during election periods. There has always been a small amount of immigration, until recently it had made no difference to our country. Carlos Cortiglia, an Italian who came to Britain in 1989: "I like the UK, I love the British way of life". Carlos does not want to dress his wife up in a burkha, or change our country; Sharia is not for the European peoples. "The Left seek to destroy; we seek to preserve".
It wasn't the sore fingers making the bobbles that forced me ti rip it back - honest :) It was just that I felt the many colour changes in the yarn were swamping the pattern rather than allowing the bobbles to be the design feature. So it is no more. I still want to make that cardigan though, I'll just have to go through the stash and find a nice single colour yarn to work with.
We worked throughout the summer on these issues, tackling them one by one to make sure the iPads were ready for the classroom.
Most of the places that made the top ten were some of the most popular in all of the country, perhaps something to do with the number of tourists who frequent there or the street parties and events that attract hundreds of thousands of visitors every year.
I've jotted ideas down on receipts, napkins and kids spelling lists. When I am in the zone and spending a lot of time thinking of ideas they often come to me at inconvenient moments. If I don't write them down, I don't always remember them. (Even when it is a book title that I will never use just because of a ficticious storyline I made up to tease a friend).
Alright, part of me wants to talk about every detail – Stan and Alexi (“She saved your life” – truer words, lad, truer words), Mitch and Tina (I loved watching them together, even though the kid seems bent on screwing with the woman. I think they get most of what they each need from one another), and the letter Mitch had in her keepsakes box. Who is THAT guy? I guess she never sent it? It didn’t have a return address on it…the website says it was to a ‘David’, but now I can’t remember if there was a last name to it, or not. I guess not one we were supposed to recognize. Hopefully. I’m going to watch that part again.
..year: 2001
